_	Since the revelation that he is Loki's son, he has also demonstrated knowledge of magic and spell casting.
_	He probes through the school yearbook of 1979 and is startled with the revelation that the lady he has been speaking with every night, was in love with his own father.
_	This statement was largely due to the revelation that yet another Plum Grove teacher had been diagnosed with cancer.
_	Despite the revelation that Kekua did not exist, former NFL player Reagan Maui'a said that he twice met someone claiming to be Kekua, and that they had been introduced by Tuiasosopo, whom he believed to be Kekua's cousin.
_	After mentioning the revelation that Michael thought the divorce was his fault, Roger expresses guilt over having never explained the reason for his departure, but Karen assures him that she set Michael straight, and even if he's not convinced, he'll now be able to tell them.
_	Further examples of New Testament pseudepigrapha include the "Gospel of Barnabas" and the "Gospel of Judas", which begins by presenting itself as "the secret account of the revelation that Jesus spoke in conversation with Judas Iscariot".
_	Complicating matters is the revelation that the hitchhiker Clint Delany (Ron Starr) is a psychotic who is wanted for murder.
_	Darren Franich for "Entertainment Weekly" gave the two-part premiere a collective 'B' grade, praising Martin-Green's performance as the lead and the production design as well as commenting on the "undeniable appeal" of the "introduction of a new ship, the revelation that we're watching that ship's final voyage, the cliffhanger possibility that our new hero is a fallen angel."
_	After working out a payment plan to satisfy Miranda, April attempts to move on with her life, only for it to be rocked again with the revelation that her thought-to-be-dead husband is actually alive.
_	The audience, dumbfounded by the revelation that Leonard is an opera singer, demands that he perform at the party.
_	The work proved to be hugely controversial, which was later mitigated by the revelation that the GFP process was not new but was, rather, already in use on rabbits at the lab in question.
_	A 2018 Gallup poll indicated that more people are now concerned with invasion of privacy and data gathering after the revelation that personal data of Facebook users was collected and shared with Cambridge Analytica without consent.
_	While admitting that the dream sequence and reset button technique were arguably uninspiring clichés, in the case of "Attack on Cloudbase" he defended the use of such plot devices for their suitability in both initially alarming viewers (with the apparent deaths of the main characters) and ultimately reassuring them (with the revelation that the attack on Cloudbase was, in the end, "all a dream").
_	"Goodbye Stranger" opens with the revelation that Naomi has been working on fully indoctrinating Castiel to her control, and determines him to be "ready" once he kills thousands of copies of Dean.
_	He derived the theory for one dimensional infiltration and developed equations which described the infiltration on both a short term and long term scale, with the revelation that when ponded infiltration in uniform soils occurs, the flow will approach the saturated hydraulic conductivity:
_	The plot twist, in particular the revelation that Russia and the West are allies in the future, is praised by academic Nicholas J. Cull for its "progressiveness of spirit", and for exemplifying Anderson's "[taking] an end to the Cold War as a given in his work".
_	Birdee Pruitt (Sandra Bullock) is a Chicago housewife who is invited onto the Toni Post talk show under the pretense of getting a free makeover but instead is ambushed with the revelation that her husband Bill has been having an affair with her best friend Connie (Rosanna Arquette).
_	Following the revelation that Taro Namatame is not the culprit behind the murders, it is revealed that Adachi is actually behind the two first murders.
_	Of particular note is the revelation that the male-typical sexual behaviors which parthenogenetic females display turn out to be under the control of the postovulatory surge of progesterone rather than androgen, which the parthenogens do not produce.
_	Norman's claims followed the revelation that an engineer from the NSA had visited New Zealand earlier in the year to discuss how to intercept traffic on the Southern Cross cable.
_	This criticism was fuelled by the revelation that Australian fugitive Christopher Skase had used the programme to become a citizen of the island.
_	With the revelation that Katherine was pregnant with Vulcan at the time D'Ken abducted her and the fact that he killed her soon after ripping Vulcan out of her womb, the Adam X scenario remains conjecture.
_	I was thrilled by the revelation that theatre could be more than just an exercise in language, or a nice, polite, passively watched story – it could elicit a physical reaction, giving people a horrifyingly visceral roller-coaster ride.”
_	Although both Whiley and Bowman moved to weekend slots on Radio 1, the news that Whiley and Bowman would leave their weekday shows led to some controversy, with BBC bosses facing allegations of being biased against older presenters, particularly as the announcement came shortly after the revelation that 30-year-old singer Alesha Dixon would replace the much older Arlene Phillips as a judge on "Strictly Come Dancing".
_	He thought that "pretty much the only surprise in the way the humans who made up the Ood Corporation were presented came as PR girl Solana (Ayesha Dharker) escaped with the Doctor and Donna, only to betray their position by calling for the guards," and "the revelation that Ryder (Adrian Rawlins) has been working to infiltrate the Corporation is thrown away... as quickly as it is revealed."
_	Gardocki is shocked shortly thereafter when Claudette gives the signal to Dutch to arrest Ronnie before Vic can alert him himself (the exact charges are never stated, though Detective Wagenbach references both the Armenian Money Train robbery along with his decision not to come forward with the revelation that Mackey had murdered Detective Crowley as Ronnie is being handcuffed).
_	This brings the revelation that the five may be tied together by a higher force trying to make things right.
_	The Carter family have appeared heavily in the show from 2014, in high-profile storylines including Johnny's homosexuality, the revelation that Shirley is in fact Mick's mother, Linda's rape at the hands of Dean and suffering from bulimia nervosa, Stan's terminal prostate cancer, the domestic violence Tina receives from her partner Tosh, Nancy's epilepsy, Sylvie's Alzheimer's disease, Lee's depression, the revelation that Dean has a daughter, Jade with cystic fibrosis, born after a one-night stand with Shabnam Masood (Rakhee Thakrar), and baby Ollie Carter's accident and potential brain damage.
_	The series culminates in the ultimate dissolution of Clay's relationship with Orel's coach, and the revelation that Orel will one day be able to put his unhappy childhood behind him to raise a better family than the one in which he grew up.
_	The series follows a five-year-old boy and how his family cope with the revelation that he has autism.
_	In January 2018, following the revelation that he used taxpayers' money to settle a sexual harassment claim brought by a female staff member, Meehan announced that he would retire from Congress at the end of his current term and not seek reelection in 2018.
_	This succinctness makes far more pointed the revelation that the speaker is Lucy’s lover; that only emerges in Wordsworth’s final stanza but enters Anderson’s poem at a much earlier point.
_	Adding to the atmosphere of cynicism about the war's aims and causes is the revelation that one of its effects was to change history and cause an Axis victory in World War II.
_	This was culminated on the 10th June 2008 with the revelation that Voodoo will focus on high-end, top spec computers rather than gaming machines.
_	If it does not shine, there is darkness", the Gospel of John emphasizes the revelation that God as Jesus Christ is the "light of the world".
_	His family's connections to the situation in Zimbabwe are thoroughly explored, in particular with the revelation that his father was a Polish Jew fleeing the Warsaw ghetto.
_	The plot concept is predicated on a vast fictional conspiracy beginning with the revelation that Jules Verne did not merely "write" the stories behind his famous science fiction classic books "Twenty Thousand Leagues Under the Sea", "Journey to the Center of the Earth" or "Around the World in Eighty Days" — but actually experienced these adventures personally.
_	Eleven years later, the storyline was readdressed with the revelation that Malcolm Winters (Shemar Moore) is her biological father.
_	The most notable storyline involving Mark was the revelation that he had contracted HIV.
_	On the journey, Moist and Vimes are faced by various problems, such as numerous attacks by Dwarfish fundamentalists, a poor attempt at infiltration, a landslide, and the revelation that the Low King is in fact a pregnant female.
_	The first sign of trouble was the revelation that Australian equine quarantine would prevent the country from hosting the equestrian events.
_	Then, after fifteen days, Muhammad received the revelation that is "Sura Al-Kahf" ("The Cave"), the eighteenth chapter of the Quran.
_	Meanwhile, the revelation that Cuban advisers had been engaged by South African regulars with armour of their own prompted President Fidel Castro to approve a request from FAPLA for direct military assistance.
_	The duo succeeded, but Shredder was livid at the revelation that Steranko was behind the theft of the Kabuto helmet, and a battle with the Turtles and the Foot Clan ensued over the captured Karai, who eventually escaped.
_	The last such "mystery Simpsons storyline", as BBC News called it, occurred with the "Alone Again, Natura-Diddily" episode in which it was announced prior to the broadcast that a character would be killed in the episode, leading to weeks of speculation before the revelation that it was Maude Flanders.
_	The case drew national attention by focusing on the safety of children in casinos and on the revelation that Strohmeyer's friend, David Cash Jr., said he saw the crime in progress but did not stop it.
_	Once the sin is committed, the landlord makes the revelation that how he conned Parshuram into believing that the baby was his, which in reality was his nephew’s, and that he could not bear the thought that his crippled nephew sires one and not him.
_	The battle ends with the victory of Sforzando, and the revelation that the Queen had only a few years left to live, as her barrier magic requires the user to pay by giving up their lifespan.
_	Many reviewers were unsurprised at the revelation that Widmore sent the freighter to the island.
_	In his review of the novel, Miles decried the revelation that the Grandfather is a future Doctor as "crass and predictable", labelling this version of the character as "just the Valeyard with a new haircut".
_	Subsequently, most of the revelation that Cane was alive and that Caleb was the person that died occurred only in May 2011, months after Caleb's death, meaning the character had no legitimate airtime.
_	The theme of the poem is consistent with Ginsberg's revelation in his original vision of Blake: the revelation that all of humanity was interconnected.
_	Despite the revelation that Weaver/T-1001 is an enemy of Skynet, it is still unknown where her allegiance lies.
_	After four and a half years, "BrainTeaser" was withdrawn, following the revelation that production staff were faking winners on the programme's premium rate call-in competition.
_	In connection with the revelation that the theatre is a good place to meet girls, for instance, Ovid, the classically educated trickster, refers to the story of the rape of the Sabine women.
_	The storyline ended the 1998 season with a whodunit that led into 1999 with the revelation that Mackenzie Choat (Ingrid Park) was the assailant.
_	Unlike Tima's desire to be human, the cause for Mitchi's destructive rampage in the manga's climax is the revelation that, as a robot, she does not have parents.
_	Their conversation eventually leads to the revelation that Amelia and some of her peers plan to magically reconstruct the events of the night of Jake Purifoy's turning.
_	Kuja turns against Garland to avoid being taken over at the conclusion of the plan and succeeds in killing him, but is shaken by the revelation that his remaining lifespan is limited.
_	With the revelation that Vito Spatafore was homosexual, Patsy was one of the few crew members not to bay for blood — he laughed at Christopher's jokes and his statement "I could care less" earned derision from Paulie Gualtieri.
_	In November 2004, following a period of turmoil caused by the revelation that Shell had been overstating its oil reserves, it was announced that the Shell Group would move to a single capital structure, creating a new parent company to be named Royal Dutch Shell plc, with its primary listing on the London Stock Exchange, a secondary listing on the Amsterdam Stock Exchange, its headquarters and tax residency in The Hague, Netherlands and its registered office in London.
_	Following "Infinite Crisis", the year-long weekly maxi-series "52" (2006–2007) led to the revelation that Multiverse still exists, in the form of 52 alternate universes.
_	In the chaos following Mystra's murder by Cyric, Shar restored Netheril, which prompted the revelation that Amaunator did not die, but rather, became Lathander.
_	His victory is somewhat muddied by the revelation that Griba - his mentor - is actually Dakkar's predecessor, and had trained Ator so that he could retake his position as High Priest.
_	In March 2017 came the revelation that Eisner was interested in a takeover of Portsmouth F.C, a football club in the south of England that had fallen on hard times before being taken over by its fans.
_	It roughly followed the idea proposed in Jurgens' memo, but added in the revelation that the mastermind behind the saga was Harry Osborn.
_	Abellana also reveals that the most difficult scene she have done was the revelation that "her husband was gay".
_	The furious Toyman prepares to shoot Daffy, but is put off the idea by the revelation that all the other Looney Tunes and the DC superheroes are all there too.
_	451 was a Rigellian Recorder who helped Howard and Maria Stark bring their son (which apparently was Tony but was found to be Arno, with the revelation that Tony was adopted) to life after she almost loses him while pregnant; in exchange, he conducted experiments in the fetus, making it a future genius.
_	(McAdoo's candidacy was hurt by the revelation that he had accepted money from Edward L. Doheny, an oil tycoon implicated in the Teapot Dome scandal.)
_	Part of the genesis of this bill was the revelation that the makers of "" had included, through embedded code that was discovered and made accessible to the public, sexually explicit content inconsistent with the game’s Mature rating.
_	Furthermore, the revelation that Peter Pan is actually Rumple's father is similar to another scene in "The Empire Strikes Back" where Vader reveals that he is Luke's father.
_	Angry about the revelation that Percy (who later apologized saying that they can be friends outside the hospital, but not inside) was using her, Stevens accidentally administers the wrong dialysis to a patient, making her an unviable candidate for the kidney transplant she was scheduled to receive.
_	In the year following the release of "The W" Cappadonna had become dissatisfied with being in the group (RZA has said he felt unhappy that people outside of the group did not respect him as much as the original nine members) and had also been in dispute with the group over the revelation that his manager Michael Caruso was a police informant.
_	This leads to the revelation that Corey is secretly using Amphetamines.
_	Then came the revelation that the stations would be run in the interim by Bridgwater Broadcasting Services (BBS)
_	Seldon has the revelation that he could to try to develop psychohistory using Trantor itself as a test case because of the great cultural diversity of its sectors.
_	The scene begins with the revelation that someone has died; however, exactly who has died is a rather obscure matter.
_	Surprisingly, the hostage scenario ends with the revelation that Yuki had enabled the captor to escape at the very beginning of negotiations, and was herself the mastermind behind the event in an attempt to financially ruin Mizuha's father.
_	In 2004, the Seibu Group collapsed due to the revelation that the head of Kokudo (the predecessor of Seibu Holdings), Yoshiaki Tsutsumi, had falsified financial statements for over forty years.
_	Kyle is crushed over the end of his orphanage project, while Cartman and the others are mostly still in shock about the revelation that Slash does not exist.
_	The mini-series concluded with the revelation that the goddess Athena has in fact been defeated and replaced by the Apokoliptian New God Granny Goodness, suggesting that the shelter that Harley Quinn and Holly Robinson are staying in is actually a Female Furies camp.
_	James Poniewozik of "Time" magazine concluded that the episode "was not the revelation that 'Peter' was, though a phase-shifting Olivia’s mistaking of Walternate for Walter was one of the series’ most mindblowing moments (and, again, a Lostian bit of disorienting sleight of hand).
_	On 7 October 2016, an hour after the media had begun to dedicate wall-to-wall coverage of the revelation that Trump had bragged on video about sexually harassing women, WikiLeaks began to release emails hacked from the personal account of Clinton campaign chairman John Podesta.
_	The Klan quickly fell apart under the revelation that Stephenson had abducted, raped, and murdered Madge Oberholtzer.
_	Fuchsia's death, in chapter 75, is precipitated by "mounting melancholia" brought on by the revelation that she had loved a murderer.
_	The arc closes with Hazel successfully reunited with her parents and the revelation that Alana is once again pregnant.
_	His conservative credentials came under scrutiny following his death and the revelation that he had not been faithful in his first marriage, with a long-term mistress, Mary Rose Cunningham, who bore him a daughter, Catherine.
_	Further cause of political controversy was the revelation that 98 of the competition's 235 entrants were members of Japan's armed forces, including Tamogami and 77 other officers in Japan's air force.
_	However, while Clarke's story ended with the priest in despair after the revelation that the alien civilization had perished in order to light "the Christmas star," the TV episode included the addition of an epitaph by the aliens, revealing their optimism about their place in the universe.
_	Lola was accused of not being able to care for her baby, named Lexi, and Phil took custody of her on the revelation that she was Ben's daughter.
_	Whilst the allegations regarding the "News of the World" continued to receive coverage in the broadsheets and similar media (Grant appeared, for example, on BBC Radio 4) it was only with the revelation that the voicemail of the by then murdered Millie Dowler had been hacked, and evidence for her murder enquiry had been deleted, that the coverage turned from media interest to widespread public (and eventually political) outrage.
_	Although there are plans for ARUS to accept the members from New JIOR, the revelation that its members are Magius-like beings results in him ordering the slaughter of them.
_	Within the agents' memories is the revelation that the Soviet Union has performed similar intelligence-amplification experiments, but on a dog instead of a chimpanzee, foreshadowing a new arms race.
_	Lizzie's psychotic behavior and Mika's innocence are addressed in the second half of the season, with the revelation that Lizzie was feeding rats to the walkers at the prison.
_	In this period the revelation that dossiers on virtually every public figure in the country had been compiled by the secret service resulted in the SIFAR affair.
_	Among other information retrieved from the archives was the revelation that the remaining Italian stone mosaics were found in the burned debris of the castle.
_	Reports had appeared in the media that some players had become uneasy with Patston’s role in the team and how much power McKenzie had given her, and some believed she wasn't qualified for the position she had, particularly following the revelation that Patston had input into the player disciplinary measures that occurred on the 2013 Spring Tour.
_	"The maximum they are capable of is having the revelation that 'today you are healthy, strong, drinking like a calf and subject to no harm, and tomorrow bam!
_	After the revelation that Patriotville is not really getting a casino, the mayor and his cohorts are imprisoned for the abuse of town funds.
_	Shortly after this incident further embarrassment was caused by the revelation that the FAI had sent news of Ireland midfielder Andy Reid's recall to the national side to the player's former club Tottenham despite the fact that he was now a Charlton player.
_	As the CSI team begins to celebrate with Catherine even offering to go get them breakfast, Brass tells them the news that Holly has been shot and is in hospital with the revelation that she's not being expected to survive.
_	Her father supports her, but ends up abandoning his family following the revelation that he has a secret son.
_	The latter being a self-destructive character, their relationship is short-lived following the revelation that he is a drug dealer.
_	While serving in the Senate, Rothfuss joined with Republican State Senator Hank Coe to sponsor legislation that would require "every Wyoming high school student to attend school through the 12th grade or until their 18th birthday, unless a parent agreed otherwise", which was prompted by the revelation that, although Wyoming spends nearly $16,000 per student, it has a low graduation rate.
_	Daniel was initially portrayed as a quiet and well mannered child but the revelation that Sarah (Amanda Billing) was his mother sent him on a downward spiral, Blakiston commented:
_	Their relationship survived the revelation that Ken and Elizabeth had been together after Todd moved to Vermont, but ended when Jessica fell in love with her surfing trainer, Christian Gorman.
_	According to Kevin M. Brettauer of "PopMatters" the revelation that Hydra has been in control of S.H.I.E.L.D. all along caused a great deal of controversy among comic book fans.
_	Sue's softer side manifests following the revelation that her sister has Down syndrome.
_	With the revelation that Terra is half-Esper, the Returners ask her to travel to the sealed gate separating the humans' world from the Espers' world with the goal of recruiting the Espers to assist in their revolution against the Empire.
_	Broken at this revelation, Kildare delays announcing the revelation that Cree was the Golem to the press until after Elizabeth is hanged, granting her the 'fame' of eliminating the Golem rather than the greater fame of being a killer.
_	G'kar meets with Ta'lon in his quarters and speaks to him about the revelation that he has had recently about the future of the Narn people and how the humans are the key to that.
_	Maggie's life became further complicated by the revelation that Dr. Daniel Jonas was really the product of the eggs she had given in hopes of having a child years ago.
_	Many fans and critics reacted negatively to the revelation that Principal Seymour Skinner, a recurring character since the first season, was an impostor.
_	The two then reflect on the revelation that Buffy stole from a lucrative bank to support her and the Slayer army and how she and Willow are having complex issues.
_	After the sinking of seven US merchant ships by German submarines, and the revelation that the Germans were trying to get Mexico to make war on the United States, the US declared war on Germany on 6 April 1917.
_	Further, the revelation that Volkoff was born Hartley Winterbottom and raised by his mother in Somerset, England, casts doubt on the place of birth given in Chuck's flash.
_	Benny Fazio and Terry Doria to look for Vito Spatafore at his goomah's beach house following the revelation that Vito was possibly homosexual.
_	The series ends with the revelation that David Sowerbutts is storing the corpse of his mother Maureen (who has died of cancer) in a bathtub filled with ice, suggesting that she could be resurrected by the same technique.
_	One result of this shift was the revelation that men cared more about how they look than the women shopping for them had.
_	Her testimony on May 18, 1926 included the revelation that Coates had told her that Senators Capper, Watson, Dill, and Fletcher "had come to her for readings" and that "table tipping seances are held at the White House" with President Coolidge and his family.
_	At the microphone he made a number of provocative comments, including the revelation that Kennedy was sleeping with Mary Pinchot Meyer.
_	Amanda (Becki Newton) asks Daniel why he won't talk to his mother after the revelation that Tyler (Neil Bledsoe) is his half-brother.
_	Among the report's findings were the revelation that the vast majority of allegations made in the diocese were not reported to the Garda, as required by the Church's 1996 guidelines; that the Bishop of the Diocese, John Magee, and others had withheld full co-operation with the Government's investigation and had deliberately misrepresented his own response to the allegations; and that the Vatican itself had both refused to co-operate in the investigation and counselled the Diocese that the 1996 guidelines were not binding.
_	In 2013, after the revelation that the Brazilian Presidency and the German Chancellery were spied on by the United States intelligence service, Angela Merkel moved closer to Brazil.
_	In 2016, the R.I. pension fund voted against reelecting all members of the Wells Fargo Board of Directors, following the revelation that the bank had committed massive fraud against its customers.
_	During her second stint on the show, her storylines include a friendship with Stacey Branning (Lacey Turner), a relationship with Kush Kazemi (Davood Ghadami), the revelation that she has a secret daughter, Jade Green (Amaya Edwards), whose father is Dean Wicks (Matt Di Angelo), delivering a stillborn son named Zaair, and suspecting an affair between Kush and Stacey.
_	He used wire recording to record interviews with agricultural workers, and this led him to the revelation that entire radio programmes could be based on recorded speech, and that "the ability to record people talking at their jobs and in their homes was not a mere novelty but a most important new means of communication."
_	Russell repeats his opening monologue, but with the revelation that he is in fact hiding behind a fake wall the robbers had constructed inside the bank's supply room.
_	A short battle results in retreat on both sides and the revelation that Shredder had stolen some Utrom resources from Krang's compound to begin creating a mutant army (in the form of Bebop, Rocksteady, Koya and Bludgeon).
_	During a bloody conflict with the Lawkillers, Gaunt managed to kill two of Major Lash's men, Preacher and Grunt, but turned his back on Lash, disgusted with the senseless bloodshed and murder, including the revelation that the enemy he had killed months ago was his biological son.
_	Although he initially led the party's criticism of the Koizumi administration, particularly in regards to connections between LDP lawmakers and scandal-ridden Livedoor, the revelation that a fake email was used to try and establish this link greatly damaged his credibility.
_	Penny's ego is shattered by the revelation that she is considered beneath her sisters.
_	"BuddyTV"'s senior writer John Kubieck was shocked by Lilith's debut in "Jus in Bello", specifically by the revelation that she appears as a little girl.
_	In "The Daily Telegraph", James Walton was disappointed with the revelation that the crimes stemmed from sexual abuse; "once quite a daring TV subject, now a rather clichéd short cut to the black recesses of the human heart".
_	God answered their prayers with the revelation that they would only have spiritual descent.
_	This, coupled with the revelation that Sam could control his leaping if he so chose, triggers Sam leaping into
_	Although Leo succeeds in saving the colony, he is saddened by the revelation that A.D.A. is programmed to self-destruct Jehuty in BAHRAM's fortress Aumann.
_	He was defended by critics, scholars and friends including Peter Bogdanovich, who rebutted Kael's claims in a 1972 article that included the revelation that Kael had appropriated the extensive research of a UCLA faculty member and did not credit him.
_	Introduced in a cameo in the first-season episode "Providence" before making a more prominent appearance in "Nothing Personal", this incarnation is promoted from the rank of colonel to brigadier general for his efforts in bringing down the remnants of S.H.I.E.L.D. following the revelation that the organization had been compromised by Hydra.
_	With the revelation that her long-lost love has returned, Blair and Todd may find themselves drawn to each other again, while Téa is currently married to Victor.
_	"The Rubber Band" opens with the revelation that Wolfe has added a workout to his daily schedule.
_	Bechdel's coming out as a lesbian is complicated by the revelation that Bruce was a closeted homosexual whose extra-marital affairs included underage males.
_	O'Neal went as far as to say that he "[wasn't] the one buying love, [Bryant was] the one buying love", a reference to Bryant's purchase of a multi-million dollar diamond ring for his wife in the aftermath of the revelation that Bryant had been unfaithful to her.
_	He described the main Jin-Sun storyline as "delicate and gripping," and believed Sun's eventual decision to stay with her husband was as "intriguing" as the revelation that she could speak English.
_	Lancia's intention was that the restyled Beta would help to re-establish Lancia's credibility after the debacle of the rusting Betas: "Lancia´s position took an unreasonably big knock as a result of the revelation that they were buying back cars with corroded sub-frame mounting points...a new Lancia today - thanks to the over-compensation that was necessary to make their point - promises to be as rust resistant as any of its rivals" wrote UK's "Autocar" in 1981.
_	Gilmore's resignation followed pressure from senior Ministers and the revelation that he had misled the Prime Minister.
_	The storyline of the final episode was the revelation that the revived series and glamorous hotel had been a dream of supermarket worker and Crossroads fan Angela, with all the other characters revealed as shoppers.
_	Hilary hires a new assistant in Mariah Copeland (Camryn Grimes) and they clash over how to handle the revelation that Mariah's mother Sharon (Sharon Case) has secretly been raising her ex-husband Nick's (Joshua Morrow) presumed dead son.
_	The two groups are also after Scully's son William, with the revelation that the Smoking Man is his father.
_	It marked the first episode in which Fox Mulder loses his belief in extraterrestrial life and the revelation that someone inside the FBI has tried to discredit Mulder and Scully's work on the X-files.
_	Jake about the revelation that his father is still alive.
_	After a long and intense trial, during which the truth of Rob's abusive nature was exposed publicly, as well as the revelation that he had raped Helen, she was acquitted on both counts of attempted murder and Grievous Bodily Harm.
_	Her time with the team came with the revelation that she was pregnant, despite not having sex and the realization that the child was the unborn life essence of the child conceived when the Predator entity raped the first Star Sapphire.
_	However the revelation that Ricochet had infected the Insecticons with a virus that would ultimately kill the clones, and the arrival of more Autobots meant that Deathsaurus' plans were defeated.
_	Dr. Saunders struggles with the revelation that she is a Doll and gets some surprising revelations from Topher.
_	Clark protests, knowing that the revelation that Superman is an alien will drive people away and points out that they have no real proof.
_	Later she was arrested together with her husband after the revelation that her company "First Travel" has committed a hajj scam by using the Ponzi scheme.
_	The series included the end of Spencer and Louise's relationship after the revelation that Spencer cheated, then both of their attempts to move on as Louise begins a new romance with Andy, and Spencer tries his luck with Lucy.
_	Winston survived this eviction on Day 44 after the revelation that the new housemates would decide who was evicted instead of the public.
_	"Impossible Motherhood" generated controversy on publication for the revelation that the author had 15 abortions in 17 years between the ages of 16 and 33.
_	Executive producer Susan Bower had hinted previously that the milestone would involve Paul and Alan Fletcher teased audiences with the revelation that something horrible would happen to an iconic character.
_	When Tom initiates a friendly rough-and-tumble fight between the two of them, Douglas suddenly realizes what it is: the revelation that he's alive.
_	The revival of the title was controversial with many longtime Legion fans, as it incorporated several major "retcons," including the editorially-mandated excision of Superboy from Legion history; the housing of Proty's consciousness in Lightning Lad's body; and the revelation that former Science Police liaison Shvaughn Erin was actually a formerly male transsexual who used drugs to maintain her female identity, while her longtime beau Element Lad was of ambiguous sexuality and would not have required her to be female.
_	Stunned by the revelation that they almost executed an innocent man, the Circle quietly disbands.
_	The story ends with the revelation that Annie, clinging to life as Terry drove her to the hospital after the original assault, died when his car crashed into one driven by Joanna's father, in which the eleven-year-old Joanna was a passenger.
_	In August 2017, Wood was longlisted for Best Actor and Best Bad Boy at the Inside Soap Awards, while the revelation that Max is in a secret relationship with Fi was longlisted for Best Shock Twist.
_	In reality, Ramsay leads Theon in a circle back to the dungeon and reimprisons him, tormenting Theon with the revelation that he was the architect of his suffering all along.
_	Unfortunately, the night she lost the baby, Roger was too wrapped up in his own life—mainly the revelation that Hart Jessup was his son.
_	The development works caused minor controversy in November 2008 with the revelation that drinking water was being used in large quantity across the site to suppress dust.
_	Unfortunately, numerous pressures added strain to the relationship- trust issues, Lucy's interfering, money woes and the revelation that Ian's brother Ben had murdered Heather Trott- and Mandy, seeing that Ian was ready to give up his daughter for her, left him on their wedding day in May 2012.
_	Meanwhile, he is distracted by the revelation that his unmarried daughter Alexandra, who is about the same age as Francesca, is pregnant.
_	Most disturbing of all, however, was the revelation that Grynszpan would claim that he had shot vom Rath because he had had homosexual relations with him.
_	In a 1970s concert he introduces the song with the revelation that he wrote the song whilst on a train, and was thinking about Alfred Hitchcock, no doubt reflecting the fact that many of Alfred Hitchcock's film plots were set on trains.
_	He highlighted the revelation that Littlefinger's actions "put the story of the entire series into motion."
_	Her search for answers to her mysterious past, which was the driving force behind her accepting the governess position at Collinwood, would have originally led to the revelation that Victoria was the product of an affair between Paul Stoddard and an unknown woman.
_	The dinner ends when the phoenix, horrified, screams in anguish at the revelation that the main dish is a large turkey, driving the guests away from the table.
_	Though he was acquitted, Logan's behavior became erratic over that summer, because of his trial and because of the revelation that his father had been having an affair with Lilly and had killed her.
_	Hilary and Mariah clash over how to handle the revelation that her mother Sharon Newman (Sharon Case) has secretly been raising her ex-husband Nick's (Joshua Morrow) presumed dead son.
_	Victoria responds to the kiss with the revelation that Klaus intends to propose to her soon and she and Ted part on amicable terms, though she also warns
_	In this episode, the last and main Red Devil is finally revealed, and the episode also focuses on the aftermath of the revelation that impacts the characters' fates.
_	His desire to marry Miranda has faded with the revelation that Moxie is her sister, but having given his word he sees it as his duty to go ahead with the marriage.
_	Complications in the brothers' relationship included childhood jealousies, the revelation that they were brothers, Dimitri's one-night stand with Edmund's wife Maria and subsequent question of the paternity of Maddie Grey, and the Dimitri, Alex, and Edmund triangle.<ref name="Soap Opera Digest 12/09/97"></ref><ref name="Soap Opera Digest 10/03/00"></ref>
_	Kael was shocked at the case made against her—including the revelation that she had taken credit for the work of Suber, something Bogdanovich learned through his own connections at UCLA.
_	Zhiheng's arrest—and the revelation that he had been operating a restaurant for months after dismembering the eatery's former owners—resulted in the urban legend that he had baked his victims into pork buns.
_	Although the Asylum is subsequently obliterated, the Prime Minister of the Daleks explains that "it is offensive to us to destroy such divine hatred", and the Doctor is sickened at the revelation that hatred is actually considered beautiful by the Daleks.
_	The storyline also was harshly criticized for progressing too slowly, as it was a six-month period before the revelation that Nikki Newman (Melody Thomas Scott) killed Diane in self-defense.
_	Then Cassie sets her sights on her then-unknown half-brother Lucas Roberts and almost sleeps with him before the revelation that he is indeed her half-brother.
_	The review also notes the revelation that U.S. President John F. Kennedy attempted to persuade Israel to abandon its nuclear program, and angry notes were exchanged between Kennedy and Israeli Premier David Ben-Gurion in 1963.
_	The next day in court, the prosecution drops a bombshell with the revelation that between 1989 and 1994, while he and his mother lived in Seattle, Eric had been admitted to various hospitals with unexplained abdominal cramps a total of "twenty-six times", which was eventually diagnosed as laxative abuse.
_	"Middlesex" depicts the tribulations of attaining an identity, especially while dealing with the revelation that the American Dream is a delusion that has already disappeared.
_	Gavin Fuller's review for "The Daily Telegraph" praised the suspense and "the revelation that all the statues were Angels" which he called "genuinely shocking".
_	As it spread, searches were carried out against Valensi and his accomplices which led to several arrests and the revelation that duped officials in Lille had been "hoaxed in the most complete and amusing manner" by Valensi and two accomplices into thinking that they were Moorish notables.
_	The lower right figure, which is recognized as the Holy Spirit by the dove over its head, has its hands crossed, a gesture associated with the Annunciation: the revelation that Mary will give birth to Christ.
_	On June 1, 2005, Colson appeared in the national news commenting on the revelation that W. Mark Felt was Deep Throat.
_	In "Good Mourning", the physicians are seen dealing with the revelation that a dead John Doe is their beloved co-worker Dr. George O'Malley (T.R. Knight), and dealing with the aftermath of Dr. Izzie Stevens (Katherine Heigl)'s near-death experience.
_	Following the revelation that Conservative MP Derek Conway paid his son from his expenses to do no work, public interest in elected representatives' expenses mounted.
_	Upon the revelation that Cassie's "ghost" was an actual person hired by Cassie's adoptive grandfather, Victor Newman (Eric Braeden) to gaslight her mother Sharon, several connections which Mariah shared with other characters on the show's canvas came to light.
_	The characters were shown to reconcile later in the year when Ricky supported Bianca through a personal crisis — the revelation that she had unknowingly tried to seduce her estranged father David Wicks (Michael French).
_	Mark's major storylines center around his relationship with his family, having to deal with Tricia's breast cancer, the revelation that Chrissie is not his biological daughter, and Tricia's death in a road traffic accident.
_	This creates a positive change in the town, but the plans are disrupted by Nahum's suspicions about Percy and the revelation that a local hermit is Hannah's shell-shocked, Vietnam veteran son.
_	The fifth season begins with the revelation that Chief Gillespie has a daughter by the name of Lana Farren, played by Christine Elise (formerly of "Beverly Hills, 90210").
_	In 2007, after his appointment by Florida governor Charlie Crist to direct the state's juvenile justice programs led to the revelation that his master's degree was from an unaccredited school, McNeil said that he had selected St. John's because he wanted to attend a "faith-based university" and acknowledged that he might have been deluded by the institution.
_	The story ends with the revelation that Tyke is a girl, her full name being Theodora Tiler.
_	The allegations that a banknote counting machine had been found in serving Interior Minister Muammer Güler's son's house, as well as the revelation that large amounts of money had been hidden in shoe boxes in the house of the CEO of Halkbank caused a media storm.
_	Drug testing of racehorse urine has led to the revelation that among levamisole equine metabolites are both pemoline and aminorex, stimulants that are forbidden by racing authorities.
_	Jake eventually stumbles onto the revelation that Cora Merrill has been leading him on and actually working for Jason Dominic to knock off the blackmailers after Jake has located them for her.
_	A convoluted explanation includes the revelation that the planet Antalin had been terraformed to resemble Skaro and destroyed in its place.
_	The shocking event buried in all the mundane details is the revelation that "The Vice-President's gone mad!".
_	With the revelation that Tracy Jordan (Tracy Morgan) is still in New York City somewhere, Liz Lemon (Tina Fey) and Kenneth Parcell (Jack McBrayer) conduct a search to find him before upper management can cancel "TGS" in his absence.
_	The book gained interest in 2005, with the revelation that Felt was "Deep Throat", the Watergate scandal whistleblower who assisted "Washington Post" reporter Bob Woodward in his and Carl Bernstein's investigation.
_	Upon their return, the Fantastic Four could not move back into Four Freedoms Plaza, as it had been destroyed by the Thunderbolts, shortly after the revelation that they were actually the Avengers' longtime foes, the Masters of Evil.
_	The episode concludes the revelation that her stepmother actually wanted her stepdaughter to inherit the throne and had attempted to thwart actual assassins who did not want a woman to rule their country.
_	Spender served as literary editor until 1967, when he resigned due to the revelation that year of the covert CIA funding of the magazine, which he had heard rumoured, but had not been able to confirm.
_	The first season's storylines include the construction of an oil pipeline, Zach Powers' vendetta against the Colbys, the romance between Jason and his sister-in-law Francesca, the subsequent collapse of Jason's marriage to Sable, and eventually the revelation that Jason, not his brother Philip, is in fact Jeff's father.
_	It was soon clear the revelation that telephone calls were recorded "en masse" would have a major impact on court cases.
_	Matt Richenthal of TV Fanatic commented on the bizarre events of the episode, "Nothing much happened on "American Horror Story" this week, except for an appearance by The Black Dahlia, a cameo by The Pope and the revelation that Vivien might be giving birth to the Antichrist, just your basic episode of the FX drama."
_	After initial bonding, Charlie and Dolly begin an affair which carries on until the revelation that Dolly is pregnant brings him back to reality.
_	As plainly stated by Andrew Marszal of "The Telegraph", "Rutherford overcooked it, particularly in his opening gambit – the revelation that scientists have developed a new hybrid breed of 'spider-goats'... we were left a little disappointed as Freckles, Pudding and Sweetie chomped and grazed around the farm looking for all the world like, well, goats."
_	Propelled by the revelation that Harry, Ron, and Hermione are leaving to seek the remaining Horcruxes in "Deathly Hallows", Ginny kisses Harry in her bedroom, and they realize that they both still have intense feelings for each other.
_	Patrick and Robin begin to have a strained marriage afterwards during the trial of Robin's friend, Sonny Corinthos (Maurice Benard), for the murder of his wife, Claudia (Sarah Brown), as the well as the revelation that Sonny's son, Dante Falconeri (Dominic Zamprogna), was working undercover to bring Sonny down and then Sonny's niece Molly Lansing (Haley Pullos) framed Michael Corinthos (Drew Garrett) for that because Michael did it.
_	The love Joyce expresses is interpreted by scholars as an attempt to compensate for having failed to understand intuitively that something was going on with her daughter before the revelation that Buffy is the Slayer.
_	In a CNN interview on August 5, 2005, Davis expressed that he feels complete vindication because of the revelation that Enron manipulated the California energy market and because of Schwarzenegger's then-low approval ratings.
_	"How It's Gotta Be" features the revelation that the character of Carl Grimes was apparently bitten by a walker in the sixth episode, "The King, the Widow, and Rick".
_	As the argument escalates, Ethel shoots Elsa in one of her legs, and Ethel is taken aback by the revelation that Elsa has fake legs.
_	Christine Orlando of "TV Fanatic" also gave the episode a positive review, rating it a 4.5 out of 5, noting Rumpelstiltskin's subplot, saying "the revelation that Peter Pan was actually Rumpel's father totally floored me.
_	After several visits, Faye begins to like the Windasses but the adoption is threatened by the revelation that their son, Gary (Mikey North), has been discharged from the army and will be living with them.
_	Anna arrives in "Hollyoaks" with the revelation that Patrick has abused her, an accusation which he denies.
_	If picked up, it says "Thank you", followed by many cryptic phrases which are actually allusions to later parts of the game, including the revelation that Caroline is the core of GLaDOS.
_	In the wake of the revelation that passports of British citizens had figured prominently in the operation, the United Kingdom's Serious Organised Crime Agency launched its own investigation into the matter.
_	As their relationship matures, Slim has several more run-ins with the goblins which leads to the revelation that his friend Joel, and even Rya herself, can see the goblins too, and that each of them in their own way has suffered terribly from the goblins' actions in their past.
_	Canning said the auditions were "fun, though not a complete knockout", enjoyed the fact that Kathy participated in the auditions and her Susan Boyle reference "had great timing", and was "let down" by the revelation that Jayden was psychotic, noting it "[s]eemed like a bit of a cop out to the story as a whole."
_	Moore's rough outline for the series was published in "Alan Moore's Awesome Handbook" and included a budding relationship between Big Brother and Suprema, a giant planet-devouring entity called "The Goat", Shaft's fruitless crush on Twilight, and the revelation that Johnny Panic was the biological son of Supreme villain Darius Dax.
_	Another one was the revelation that the late Minato Namikaze would be Naruto's father.
_	As a result, he suffered psychological trauma and became an alcoholic, contributing to his departure from his family (along with the revelation that Maggie had been involved with Brandon before the 1994 killings).
_	Prior to the revelation that she is Kate Valentine, Chloe marries Cane, angering the Chancellors.
_	The plot revolves around Simon coming to terms with the revelation that his mother suffers from schizophrenia.
_	The movie's main selling point was the revelation that neither Yulia Volkova nor Lena Katina are, or were, lesbians.
_	In 2007, after the revelation that Eastern Health had deliberately concealed the scope of the testing errors, hundreds of patients filed a class action lawsuit against Eastern Health over the affair.
_	After the siege, the revelation that the new Bail Act had allowed Monis to be granted bail sparked calls to further tighten the law; however a review had already been conducted in the wake of earlier controversial bail releases, with the new law set "to take effect next year" (that is, on 28 January 2015).
_	Key to this finding was the revelation that none of the eighteen different players who had been drug tested on a total of thirty occasions during the course of the program had declared the supplements injections on their doping control forms, and that some had withheld information from the club doctor on Dank's instruction, revelations which damaged the credibility of other evidence put forward by the players.
_	Through the rest of the series, Álvaro and Bea endure many obstacles on their way back to each other: the firm being discovered and both Álvaro and Bea being arrested for embezzlement, Álvaro going to prison for a short time, various schemes and manipulations by Diego, other love interests, the death of Álvaro's father, and the revelation that Diego and Álvaro are half-brothers (Álvaro's father had an affair with Diego's mother).
_	She had been working for some time in fact to try to find a way out of the war for both sides, having come out of her "moment of madness" after Dukhat's death, with the revelation that Dukhat and the Vorlons had been working towards making contact with the humans, who would be absolutely critical to winning the coming Shadow War.
_	Angela seeks forgiveness from Regina after the revelation that she disclosed information to Bossman due to the pain she felt when Major Egan rejected her advances.
_	Upon the revelation that Cole won by one vote, his conscience gets the better of him and he concedes the match to Harrison.
_	Following the revelation that Ava had in fact murdered Connie Falconeri (Kelly Sullivan), head writer Ron Carlivati opened up to Michael Logan of "TV Guide" about the revelation, and whether or not he felt he had turned Ava into a cold-blooded killer.
_	Kuei begins to understand the situation, while Zuko, faced with the revelation that he has been in the right all along, collapses.
_	These stories heavily featured the revelation that Power Girl was in fact the Earth-Two Power Girl and a Kryptonian, who survived "Crisis", and that her Atlantean backstory had been a lie.
_	A series of disasters in Howell’s life – the death of his eldest son, massive losses in an investment scam and the revelation that he has been sexually assaulting female patients – lead to him declaring that he is a fraud and a godless man.
_	Many fans and critics reacted negatively to the revelation that Seymour Skinner, a recurring character since the first season, was an impostor.
_	Mo tries to console her mother but this causes an argument between the two resulting in Ina issuing the revelation that Mo is her niece and not her daughter, adding that she raised her as her own.
_	His team withdrew after the revelation that Vinokourov had doped.
_	Though it did not result in a criminal conviction, the revelation that Edwards had an extramarital affair and fathered a child, while his wife Elizabeth was dying of cancer, gravely damaged his public image and ended his career in politics.
_	In the chaos following Mystra's murder by Cyric, Shar restored Netheril, which prompted the revelation that Amaunator did not die, but rather, became Lathander.
_	At almost the same time in May, the revelation that the chief executive had asked Director Comey to let Flynn get a pass led still more observers, including Senator Angus King (I-ME), to say that impeachment might be in the offing.
_	After a man he interviewed apparently commits suicide in despair over being a suspected communist, Smiley resigns from the Circus in disgust; the revelation that the man's death may in fact have been a murder spurs Smiley to launch an independent investigation with the help of his protege, Peter Guillam, and police detective Oliver Mendel.
_	At the time, the age of consent throughout most of Europe was around that same age; hence, the revelation that she and the adult Count are sleeping together was not meant to be quite as shocking as it is often perceived these days.
_	Roz Kaveney believed the revelation that Ash is not human is "in a sense no surprise".
_	Following the match, the revelation that Douglas and Lizzy Borden were allies emerged, which would crush Rob Black to the point that Borden inherited the power of XPW.
_	She revealed this fact in March 2016 in interview with BBC Radio 5 Live, after the revelation that Maria Sharapova had been found taking a similar heart-issue drug, which later had been banned by the World Anti-Doping Agency.
_	Haynes wanted to first show the revelation that the TARDIS would appear at the reception in a small way with minor changes such as the glasses tinkling and chandelier shaking, and build it up from there.
_	Following the attacks, and the revelation that the leader of the organization (Osama bin Laden) and 15 of the 19 hijackers involved in the attacks, were Saudis, concern was expressed in the U.S. over "what role" the Saudi educational system "played in shaping the beliefs of Osama bin Laden's followers".
_	The uproar that followed the revelation that a senior UDA member was in possession of government documents led to Royal Ulster Constabulary Chief Constable Hugh Annesley appointing Stevens, an officer in Cambridgeshire Constabulary, to investigate the claims.
_	Rabinowitz elaborated further on the revelation that he received on the Mount of Olives:
_	Moira's later storylines focused on her affair with Cain Dingle (Jeff Hordley), John's death, a casual relationship with farmhand Alex Moss (Kurtis Stacey), her marriage to Cain and suffering a miscarriage , the revelation that she slept with her brother-in-law James Barton (Bill Ward) who is her son Adam's (Adam Thomas) biological father and murdering Emma Barton (Gillian Kearney).
_	The combined firm reportedly sought to merge with an English law firm following the revelation that New York-based Rogers & Wells and London-based international firm Clifford Chance were in merger talks that eventually reached fruition.
_	The ninth and tenth novels, "Dust of Dreams" and "The Crippled God", picks up the storyline on the Lether continent and deal with the activities of the 14th Army following their successful 'liberation' of the Letherii people and the revelation that the K'Chain Che'Malle species and Forkrul Assail species have returned.
_	The MP in question was not named in parliamentary debate, but JLP members gave media interviews in the following week, leading to the revelation that Golding was referring to Hay-Webster.
_	Jade's arrival also precipitated the revelation that Sonya is Callum Jones's (Morgan Baker) biological mother.
_	After the failed August coup of 1991 and the revelation that the majority of the cabinet members supported the coup, the Cabinet of Ministers was dissolved and replaced by the Committee on the Operational Management of the Soviet economy in 1991.
_	The hacking, and the revelation that a member of the Trump campaign apparently had inside information about it, were driving factors that led the FBI in July 2016 to open an investigation into Russia's attempts to disrupt the election and whether any of President Trump's associates conspired.
_	What surprises them, however, is the revelation that Kakeru died not because of an accident, but suicide.
_	In the shadows is the rebuffed teacher, who has been watching the entire trial, watching Martin closely, seeing his reaction to the revelation that she had, in fact, been true to him in her heart.
_	Aside from the revelation that the AAP had been reorganized and is still operational, Gentry is still frustrated with lack of new information and lets him go.
_	Unfortunately the defence never fully recovers from the revelation that Adam read the novel "Frankenstein" while absorbing all the books in the Doc's library, and the judge pronounces the robot guilty, even though the Doc's death was accidental.
_	However, he knows they could not survive the revelation that they had tried to kill the President.
_	This leads to the revelation that Patch is actually a fallen angel from Heaven who was trying to kill her, and in doing so, gain a human body.
_	The stated reason for the change was the revelation that “William Rufus DeVane King was a slaveowner and a ‘gentle slave monger’ according to John Quincy Adams.
_	Thanks to Emma's advice, the three witness the flashback that shows Fiona become the Black Fairy and the revelation that Gold was destined to become the Savior.
_	A chance discussion between Raja, Dinesh and Geeta leads to the revelation that Vinod is, indeed, the new drug boss.
_	She was rocked by the revelation that her father had assumed the name of Brad Carlton, and was in fact the son of Holocaust survivor and art historian Rebecca Kaplan.
_	This sets off a chain reaction of events from Eddie attacking Joe thinking he's Chernak attacking Rita to the revelation that the baby is really Jill's---in New York, she learned enough about Allison to pose as Allison and thus show Allison as the baby's mother.
_	Whaaa? was a segment that was sometimes introduced during coverage of news stories that Stewart claimed to find particularly bewildering, such as the revelation that the Army was firing Arabic-speaking linguists for being gay, or that AOL Time Warner had managed to lose $99 billion in a single year.
_	Smitten with Emma but taken aback by the revelation that she has moved on, Dexter decides to leave.
_	This series also featured the long triangle between Sophia, Francis and Proudlock, the rivalry between Millie and Victoria increasing, the brief reconnection between Gabriella and Ollie, and the rocky relationship between Spencer and Louise until the revelation that he cheated on her.
_	Theo struggles to accept the revelation that Lani is his sister but when he finally does, Theo becomes very territorial, even around their father.
_	In 2006, charges were filed against former museum chief financial officer Terry Gaouette, following the revelation that the museum was several million dollars in the red, a fact that allegedly had been hidden for years via illegal money transfers.
_	Mackenzie describes the scene in which Ace Ventura retches in the bathroom, following the revelation that the woman he had kissed is trans, as "one of the most memorable and blatantly transphobic/homophobic scenes".
_	The station's image was also tarnished by the arrests of reporter Charlene Mitchell for shoplifting and sports reporter Bob Gamere for drunk driving, as well as the revelation that former reporter Stephen Guptill falsely claimed two degrees on his resume.
_	Fear runs rampant throughout Tokyo with the revelation that demons in fact exist amongst us.
_	Initially, the good man or woman is scandalized by the revelation that leaders are abusing the power of their privileges.
_	She started to date Rangi Heremaia (Blair Strang) however the revelation that she had been molested by her uncle saw Ruth depart in July.
_	Character development increased during the second season, such as the revelation that MacGillis is a former member of the United States Marine Corps Silent Drill Platoon.
_	Bobby is enraged by the revelation that Jack is a Nephilim and chooses to exile him from the colony.
_	There is also the revelation that it was Robert who was behind Kayron's father's death, for which he framed Forrester, and that the Thul are not responsible for the drone attacks.
_	Introduced to the plot was the revelation that Radames' mother was a prostitute and that Zoser treated her as such and fought and schemed for Radames to achieve his position of Captain of Pharaoh's armies.
_	Following the revelation that Tiger Woods had been cheating on his wife with several different women, Conan insisted that he needed professional help to determine which of the numerous possible jokes he should tell with regards to Woods' infidelities.
_	The story begins with the scientific analysis by Pandian and ends with the revelation that the Snow Man is the incarnation of Maitreya Buddha.
_	But the revelation that his killing spree was all to cover up his homosexuality proved controversial in the media.
_	The Ostlings say that, soon after the church received the revelation that polygamy was prohibited, Utah again applied for statehood.
_	The MPD instead put much of its focus on the revelation that Levy had been having an affair with Congressman Gary Condit, a married Democrat then serving his fifth term representing California's 18th congressional district, and a senior member of the House Permanent Select Committee on Intelligence.
_	Following the revelation that the Humanplasma laboratory had aided around 30 athletes with blood doping practices, Graf admitted that her blood had been taken at the lab, but insisted that it had never been re-injected (which would have improved her performances).
_	"The Kane Mutiny" included the revelation that Kael had used Suber's work and did not credit him.
_	This "myth" was however broken with the revelation that nanovesicles, popularly known as bacterial outer membrane vesicles, released by gram-negative microbes, translocate bacterial signal molecules to host or target cells to carry out multiple processes in favour of the secreting microbe e.g., in "host cell invasion" and microbe-environment interactions, in general.
_	In August 2017, the revelation that Louis is Daniel's father was longlisted for Best Shock Twist at the Inside Soap Awards.
_	Further complicating matters is the revelation that the material Louise used is not "goop" but a highly-concentrated adhesive concocted by Teddy that he calls his "sticky spackle."
_	Her son seeks revenge by ramming her car with his in an assassination attempt, which is followed up by the revelation that the Tobins had a hand in Tom's murder.
_	This is part of the personal history she relates to its protagonist, Case, in addition to the revelation that she worked as a "meat puppet" (a prostitute) in a "puppet parlor" (a brothel where people loan out their bodies while maintained in a blanked-out state) to pay for her considerable cybernetic enhancements.
_	The party had split following the revelation that Parnell had been involved in a long-running relationship with Katharine O'Shea, the wife of a fellow MP, and was the father of most of her children.
_	This was later explained by the revelation that she had failed a drug test for clomiphene on February 16.
_	Under pressure from his stern and disapproving wife Phyllis (who wants to take her family back to live in the US), and with the revelation that Scarlett is pregnant, Mac sets out to bring Otto back with the help of his new Soviet business associates.
_	She enlists Olivia Pope & Associates to help, and further investigation leads to the revelation that one of the higher officers was responsible for the act.
_	The film combines elements from several novels in "The Dark Tower" series, serving as a canonical sequel to the novel series, which concluded with the revelation that Roland's quest was a cyclical time loop; the presence of the Horn of Eld, which Roland carries in the film, indicates that this is the next cycle; Stephen King has indicated that "The Dark Tower" film and television series will follow Roland's "last time round" to the titular Dark Tower.
_	Later, CeeCee calls Suze with the revelation that after the death of Tad's mother, Beaumont had handed over most of his business duties to Marcus, who is actually his brother.
_	The plot follows Jimmy' attempt to get Hope into a better daycare, the revelation that Burt is a sex offender, and the rest of the family becoming sex offenders from the resulting attempt to get Burt's conviction overturned.
_	Amongst discoveries made by those working on the project was the revelation that many of the game's more incongruous bosses may have originated as copyrighted characters that had to be altered for the game to be released in the United States:
_	The primary cause of this revocation was the revelation that hundreds of settlers were dead or missing following an attack in 1622 by Native American tribes led by Opechancanough.
_	In August 2017, the revelation that Louis is the father of Leela's son, Daniel was longlisted for Best Shock Twist at the Inside Soap Awards.
_	The club's financial results were announced at the start of October with an operating loss of £14m in the thirteen months to June 2013, with the revelation that the club spends more on non-playing staff than on the squad.
_	Iris about it, demanding that Iris tell Mac. Mac was devastated by the revelation that Iris was responsible for both the hostile takeover attempt of his company and for having him temporarily framed for murder.
_	Clint Mailer leaves to get the rifles and in the interim, Cooper and Nancy Mailer are drawn closer together with the revelation that Tim is not the son of Mailer.
_	Entertainment Rights has since made the revelation that when Hallmark converted all of its Filmation shows to digital format in the 1990s, only PAL-format copies were made, with the original film prints apparently discarded.
_	By the middle of the season, Gael Fashingbauer Cooper of MSNBC complained that the Angie storyline was lagging, opining that the revelation that Angie is an eco-terrorist "sounds like a plot summary dreamed up by The Onion wanting to spoof the ultimate suburban show."
_	Following the revelation that Garrett was The Clairvoyant, Paxton said, "He’s felt like he’s found a true home in Hydra, which is more of a Darwinian outfit.
_	Belle then hears a voice, which draws her to a mirror, where an image of Belle taunts her for not saving Anna, and reveals the truth about her husband, including the revelation that the dagger she has is a fake.
_	Shaffer also noted he was more frustrated about "the revelation that Bernadette wouldn't allow strippers at Wolowitz's bachelor party", as it is never explained why.
_	Also, the revelation that James had caused the FTL drive to explode, was "kind of random."
_	Particularly the revelation that the Soviet Union was behind the Katyn massacre was a disillusionment to Bakker.
_	Another version of the story ends with the revelation that Dame Gothel had untied Rapunzel's hair after the prince leapt from the tower, and it slipped from her hands and landed far below, leaving her trapped in the tower.
_	In the same year, Alan Grant and Norm Breyfogle's comic book "Anarky" concluded with the revelation that the titular character was the Joker's son.
_	The series ends with the revelation that it was only the beginning of the true story, "which goes on for ever, and in which every chapter is better than the one before".
_	Jade's reappearance in Sonya's life precipitated the revelation that Sonya is Callum's biological mother.
_	In April, 2011 Fr. Manning announced a one-month leave from his television show as a result of the revelation that he was involved in an inappropriate relation with his second cousin, Nancy Kotowski, the Monterey County, California superintendent of schools.
_	Nicola's "head is understandably all over the place" with the revelation that Phelan is her father and that Phelan's wife, Eileen, "can see how much building a relationship with Nicola means to her husband."
_	In response to the revelation that former character Violet Wilson (Jenny Platt) was originally intended to be the first lesbian character in the show, an ITV insider told the "News of the World" in July 2008:
_	Writing for "Entertainment Weekly", Darren Franich gave the two-part premiere a B grade, praising Martin-Green's performance as the lead and the production design as well as commenting on the "undeniable appeal" of the "introduction of a new ship, the revelation that we're watching that ship's final voyage, the cliffhanger possibility that our new hero is a fallen angel."
_	Although he had set Indonesia on a non-aligned course during the Cold War, the revelation that the PRRI was given assistance by the United States, caused Sukarno to adopt an anti-American stance.
_	The first to call himself a "theoretical" physicist, Planck opens his lecture in Potsdam with the revelation that, "My original decision to devote myself to science was a direct result of the discovery... that the laws of human reasoning coincide with the laws governing the sequences of the impressions we receive from the world around us; that, therefore, pure reasoning can enable man to gain an insight into the mechanism of the world."
_	Following the revelation that Darren is the father of Heather Trott (Cheryl Fergison)'s baby son, Adam teases Darren about Libby.
_	The leaked information came to light one day after the revelation that the FISA Court had been ordering a subsidiary of telecommunications company Verizon Communications to turn over to the NSA logs tracking all of its customers' telephone calls.
_	Equally surprising is the revelation that Amy has declined to take over.
_	Fear of dissolution—the kind that presages self-disclosure—often results in the revelation that “you can talk for hours before you realize you won’t say it.”
_	The episode primarily focuses on the relationship between Rick Grimes and Carol Peletier, after the revelation that she has killed two inmates out of mercy, causing Rick to make a difficult decision.
_	Following the revelation that the Affiliated Planets was a front for the Dark Circle, Xanthu remained with the reformed group.
_	Further fueling the controversy was the revelation that 53 prisoners who had been sentenced to life imprisonment under the Crime (Sentences) Act 1997 had been freed on parole since 2000.
_	The highlight of Princi's stint as Dorian was her affair with the much younger Jason Webb and the revelation that her assistant Blair Daimler was in reality her niece and out for revenge against her aunt.
_	The episode ties-into the film "", taking place concurrently with it and being affected by its events, including the revelation that main character Grant Ward (Dalton) is a member of Hydra alongside recurring character John Garrett (Bill Paxton).
_	She added that in the later seasons, the series took risks with the character, such as his heart attack, his affair, and the revelation that he had died.
_	Among the changes made to modernize the story is the revelation that female protagonists Tommy and Elle are in a same-sex relationship.
_	As David tries to stop her from entering the party, Patricia shocks him with the revelation that he is not the twins' father after all, and she has been lying to him and everyone else for years about the twins' true father.
_	As far as Oedipus is concerned, early epic accounts seem to have him continuing to rule at Thebes after the revelation that Iokaste was his mother, and subsequently marrying a second wife who becomes the mother of his children—markedly different from the tale known to us through tragedy (e.g. Sophocles' "Oedipus Rex") and later mythological accounts.
_	The 'hard fight' descended further into personalities; the accusation that Sadler had deserted Methodism for Anglicanism from worldly motives and now despised Methodists was repeated; countered by Sadler's supporters by an assertion that no orthodox Christian should vote for Marshall or Macaulay as they were both Socinians, which accusation the Whigs met with the revelation that Sadler was "sadly addicted to PROFANE SWEARING" and had ""attended" the SUNDAY parties of a certain Dowager not noted for keeping "all" the Ten Commandments"
_	Andreas later confronts Osborn with the revelation that he was not being offered a slot on Osborn's personal Avengers as well as never planning on fulfilling the vow to resurrect his sister or to give him a full Presidential pardon after his contract ended.
_	Following a victory over the criminals (and the revelation that behind it is the same doctor that performed the surgery on Bane years earlier in Peña Duro), Bane proclaims that he is "innocent" of his past crimes and urges Batman to stop hunting him.
_	The A.V. Club's Phil Dyess-Nugent gave the finale a B+ grade, stating, "The pieces fit, and the revelation that Skinner, the cop who put the wrongly convicted Ray Seward away, was actually covering up his own crimes, alters the story in a way that, if anything, makes more sense, not less."
_	At the time this wasn't mentioned, but the revelation that Healy was depressed ties in with the band's decision to take longer writing and releasing their next work.
_	Hislop then asked Humphrys several questions about quotes said by him or about him, including the revelation that Iain Duncan Smith had once remarked about his "nicely balanced package".
_	Barson's case was argued for in local and national newspapers, but the revelation that the petition had been burnt at the FA headquarters caused the affair to die down.
_	Allmusic writer Bruce Eder said that while "Live!" is a "decent" album, "it isn't remotely the revelation that one would expect or wish for -- the producers might at least have been more honest by foregoing the exclamation point."
_	Haunted by the apparition of his deceased cousin Tom (a victim of vampire Angélique) and unable to cope with the revelation that Tom's twin brother Chris was a werewolf, Joe slowly lost touch with reality and was sent to a mental hospital by Maggie.
_	Colfax's 20 years of public service ended in controversy in 1873 due to the revelation that he was involved in the Crédit Mobilier scandal.
_	When a stray comment by Max brings on the revelation that Billy and Tony were raised Catholic, the discussion transitions into a debate over the existence of God.
_	With the help of the hallucinogens he still had from Monument Valley, Jesse recovered his lost memories of his brush with God (and with it, the revelation that God feared the Saint).
_	Following the revelation that Kate Fitzgerald was an employee of the Clinic, the paper redacted the online version of her article.
_	In May 2017, Leanne decides to get Peter, Nick and Steve McDonald (Simon Gregson) to make up caused by the revelation that Steve is the father of Oliver, Simon's adoptive half-brother and they bring Simon to the beach after he missed out on a trip.
_	Meanwhile, Robin's new job at World Wide News has started badly, beginning with the revelation that the network's lead anchor is her old Metro News 1 colleague Sandy Rivers.
_	After India's Independence, a series of events like Sino-Soviet split, Sino-Indian war, and the revelation that while in jail, Dange had written letters to the British Government, offering them cooperation, led to a split in the Communist Party of India, in 1964.
_	This followed the revelation that several athletes had tested positive for that drug at the championships and received bans from the sport, including Kelli White, Chryste Gaines, Sandra Glover and Eric Thomas and John McEwen.
_	Turner and Taylor left their roles in October 2011 and on 10 December 2011, following the revelation that Ruth was pregnant and being involved in the blaze that ripped through the ED, they left Holby to begin a new life.
_	Due to the revelation that Diana is the demigod daughter of Zeus, their new dynamic is that of brother and sister.
_	Following the revelation that Stark experimented on himself at the end of "Civil War II", Beast concludes that the only option is to let the experiments do their job in healing Tony and recover on his own.
_	The BBC later issued a worldwide apology and revised its commissioning procedures after the revelation that it had been commissioning programming from FBC at token prices, which the company had then used as a PR platform for its business and political clients.
_	Despite the brave public face he wore at these events, his own doubts continued to plague him, and he was particularly fazed by Galvatron's threat of an "ultimate weapon", though the revelation that this was a bluff stirred him to action.
_	The following day, his astonishing testimony continued with the revelation that when Caroline and Pergami were travelling together in a carriage, Pergami kept a bottle with him so he could relieve himself without having to step down from the coach.
_	The Avengers become divided, both over how to approach Loki and the revelation that S.H.I.E.L.D. plans to harness the Tesseract to develop weapons as a deterrent against hostile extraterrestrials.
_	In August 2017, McIntyre was longlisted for "Best Actor" and "Best Bad Boy" at The Inside Soap Awards 2017, while the revelation that Andy is still alive was longlisted for "Best Shock Twist".
_	His parliamentary career lasted a little over four months, and he suffered constant media attacks after the revelation that his partner, Sandra Higgins, had taken out a domestic violence order against him.
_	Meanwhile, David Nusair of About.com attributes the film's failure with "the familiarity of its storyline, as the film boasts many of the elements contained within both of its predecessors – including the revelation that Princess Aurora can only be awakened from her deep slumber by a kiss from her one true love" similar to Snow White.
_	The Michaelis-Menten-like kinetics coupled with the PSIs independent function from its parent AP has thus led to the revelation that the PSI is the first known example of an “enzyme within an enzyme”.
_	However the revelation that she was married put an end to the relationship and she departed.
_	In the chaos following Mystra's death and Cyric's imprisonment, Netheril was restored, which prompted the revelation that Lathander was, in fact, Amaunator, god of the sun.
_	Ryan Mcgee of Zap2it described the revelation that Locke was a paraplegic as being "one of the show's signature moments", and commented that the episode "cemented the show as 'Must-See TV'" and was "a five-star effort."
_	However, the season ends with the revelation that Blair may be pregnant.
_	Carretta goes on to say the timing of the publication of "The Interesting Narrative" was not an accident, noting "the revelation that Gustavus Vassa was a native-born Igbo originally named Olaudah Equiano appears to have evolved during 1788 in response to the needs of the abolitionist movement."
_	A fictional character featured in this episode, Angelica Button, was later used in the season 19 episode "Smoke on the Daughter", and the revelation that the Angelica Button book series was ghost-written was the basis for the season 23 episode "The Book Job".
_	Darren Franich for "Entertainment Weekly" gave the two-part premiere a collective 'B' grade, praising Martin-Green's performance as the lead and the production design as well as commenting on the "undeniable appeal" of the "introduction of a new ship, the revelation that we're watching that ship's final voyage, the cliffhanger possibility that our new hero is a fallen angel."
_	Australia's performance was said to suffer by the revelation that most of the team had signed to play World Series Cricket (WSC) in opposition to official cricket, although skipper Greg Chappell concedes his side would have been beaten anyway.
_	Even more troubling was the revelation that Palmer's wife Sherry had concealed this from David, supposedly to protect him.
_	Writing for "The New York Times Book Review", Newbery Medal-winning author Linda Sue Park wrote that, in addition to the revelation that CJ and Nana are on their way to a soup kitchen, "it's also the warmth of their intergenerational relationship that will make this book so satisfying, for both young readers and the adults sharing it with them."
_	Following the revelation that Nick had manipulated the voting, a pen and paper were found in his belongings.
_	Following the revelation that Theresa shot Calvin Valentine (Ricky Whittle), Porter commented about what it would show from Theresa's character, saying: "I was a bit excited, too, because it's another side Theresa can show."
_	This eventually happens with the revelation that Circe is the mastermind behind the attacks and capture.
_	Following the revelation that a number of Posner's stories for the "Beast" contained portions plagiarized from articles in other publications, Posner resigned from the "Beast".
_	Because the film "" depicts the destruction of S.H.I.E.L.D. following the revelation that the terrorist group Hydra has infiltrated the former, the episode and those following it are significantly affected by it, showing the series' characters dealing with this turn of events themselves.
_	During this time, she witnessed Teg being brought before Hokkan's emperor and the revelation that Teg was only half of the warrior Urumiya, information which becomes key when Hagus is revealed to be Urumiya.
_	The quiz show scandals of the period rocked the nation and were the result of the revelation that contestants were secretly given assistance by the producers to arrange the outcome of a supposedly fair competition.
_	Michelle goes missing, and people suspect that Eric is somehow involved, though it is later revealed she has sequestered herself at home, devastated about the revelation that Jack is actually Eric.
_	Delbono was forced to announce his resignation as mayor on 25 January 2010 following the revelation that he was being investigated for crimes such as embezzlement, fraud and aggravated abuse of office.
_	The opening statement of council assisting Colonel Michael Griffin — via video link from Baghdad — included the revelation that on 21 March, just 14 days into his tour of duty, Private Kovko had dreamt of and written in his journal about his death by a shot to the head from his own pistol:
_	But the revelation that the fugitive had been pregnant at the time of her crime leads
_	Humphrey Bogart, who had been assured that the Committee membership had been vetted, and there were no communists among its membership, was incensed by the revelation that Hayden was a communist.
_	After a series of lengthening delays, Phillips eventually placed the comic on indefinite hiatus on 24 August 2004 and posted a text summary of how the story would have played out, including the revelation that one of the presumed to be heterosexual characters would enter a lesbian affair.
_	In the reconstruction, the revelation that the women and Tereus were turned into birds is related by a "deus ex machina", who Fitzpatrick believes was most likely Apollo.
_	Consequently, the revelation that "Battlestar Galactica" takes place in our collective prehistoric past means that unlike most space opera science fiction stories, the series is a fictional tale of ancient history rather than future history and serves as a fictional tale of origin for modern humanity.
_	Later, L's continued assertions of Light's guilt results in a heated argument with Soichiro, ending with the revelation that the officer who tailed Light has committed suicide.
_	Due to the revelation that Charleston had supplied improperly sized basketballs in its home conference wins over William & Mary and UNCW, the CAA announced on February 2 that those games would be treated as Charleston losses for purposes of CAA tournament seeding, although they still count as Charleston wins for all other purposes.
_	While not exploiting the Casimir force for useful work, the papers drew attention from the MEMS community due to the revelation that Casimir effect needs to be considered as a vital factor in the future design of MEMS.
_	He later wrote of the revelation that he had:
_	There's also the revelation that Julia will play a huge role against Big Jim next season."
_	May 2002 also saw the revelation that the new public works minister, Don Boudria, had spent the weekend of March 16–17, 2002 at an estate owned by Claude Boulay, the president of Groupe Everest advertising firm that head received $55 million in contracts from the public works ministry, apparently for free.
_	The company was preemptively liquidated in 2010 following the revelation that they had been illegally manufacturing and selling breast implants made from cheaper industrial-grade silicone since 2001 (instead of the mandated medical-grade silicone they had previously used).
_	At first, only Touto is seemingly able to build Guardians, until the revelation that Namba has been supporting the other two Governments as well.
_	Overall, Eugen Lovinescu argues, his was a "sentimental deception", sparked by the revelation that Iorga's followers were all Neoromantics.
_	She calls upon these personal qualities to deal with her personal issues, such as her parents' shaky relationship and the revelation that they conceived her while in high school.
_	Samson's numerous attempts to conceal the secret of his strength in the Biblical account are only referenced by Dalila in her duet with the High Priest in the opera, and the revelation that his strength resides in his hair occurs offstage.
_	Sari is shocked and distraught over the revelation that she is a robot, and instantly assumes that her "father" had actually built her, refusing to believe Sumdac's claim that he discovered her as a small liquid metal body.
_	The game was marred by the revelation that a Texas player had been competing under an assumed name.
_	They also criticised the revelation that Dan was Gossip Girl "so he not only, um, used Gossip Girl as a platform for spreading rumors, denigrating his friends, revealing his sister’s sex life in public and embarrassing ways, and, oh yes, nearly getting himself expelled (that is some ninja double-crossing skill)—he was using it to try to impress a girl that was literally the subject of his stalker-takedown-campaign for at least two years, if not for the run of the entire show."
_	The plot closes on a final flashback, which shows Dick's breakdown following the revelation that he was born out of incest to Tom's mother and his grandfather, part of the reason his adoptive father has never really accepted him or valued him as he does Tom.
_	After the revelation that Sandy Roscoe (Gillian Taylforth) is his mother, Darren Osborne (Ashley Taylor Dawson) moves out of The Dog with Sienna Blake (Anna Passey), Oscar Osborne and Charlie Dean (Charlie Behan) and into Flat 3 however two months later, they return to The Dog and Darren lets ex-wife, Nancy (Jessica Fox) move in.
_	He describes the ending as "[fitting in] well with the subtext of the series", but also say "the revelation that ‘The General is a powerful computer is a stock science fiction device."
_	Jeff and Britta begin what is seemingly a passionate relationship, but the revelation that Jeff got involved with Annie at the end of the previous year disgusts the group.
_	Another episode, "The Protector", was not aired until the very end of the last season, as it dealt with the revelation that Erin's niece, Amy, was molested by a male family friend who looked after her while her parents were in prison, which Amy remembers because the man had a rose tattoo on his penis.
_	Outside, the Doctor reels from the revelation that Missy, the woman controlling the Cybermen, is a female incarnation of the Master.
_	Upon discovering the revelation that no more mutant births occur post-Decimation and that he, his Acolytes, the X-Men, and the remaining mutants worldwide are now an endangered species, he leaves.
_	Following the revelation that Christian Cage, the number one contender for the title was unable to compete on Night Two, Herman stepped in as his match with Abyss was made a 1PW Heavyweight Championship match.
_	He considered that a "heathen in Africa" could be saved without ever hearing of Christ if he responded to the revelation that God had given him in his nature and his conscience.
_	Hoffman's guilty conscience forces him to go public with the revelation that Simon offered him a bribe.
_	Delbono was forced to announce his resignation as mayor on 25 January 2010 following the revelation that he was being investigated for crimes such as embezzlement, fraud and aggravated abuse of office.
_	Upon the revelation that Stark was alive, Rhodes quit Stark Enterprises and the friendship between the two was fractured.
_	For one couple, vicar Dan (David Conolly) and his wife Emma (Joanna Pecover) are faced with the revelation that one of them has been having an affair with the evening’s hostess Kate (Miranda Hart).
_	The stress of losing Tommy forms a rift between Isabel and her parents-as well as the revelation that the pictures Isabel posted of him at the park led the kidnapper to him.
_	Stern was unhappy with the revelation that his character's civilian identity was Ned Leeds, and in 1997 he wrote a three-issue miniseries, "Spider-Man: Hobgoblin Lives", with the retcon that Roderick Kingsley was the original Hobgoblin, and had brainwashed Leeds into serving as a fall guy.
_	The epilogue of the book mentions that due to the revelation that Jason actually does exist, Tina and Nick were both released from custody.
_	The relationship between Alicia and Johnny was ended with the revelation that the Alicia that Johnny fell in love with was actually Lyja, a member of the shape-changing alien race known as the Skrulls.
_	In response to the revelation that the conference had taken place on UCL's campus, UCL announced it would be investigating how the conference was able to occur on their campus without the university's knowledge.
_	Notable scoops by Pearce include the revelation that England were attempting to 'butter' up FIFA voters with gifts of luxury handbags in order to gain votes during their ill-fated bid for the 2018 World Cup.
_	With the release of the prequels and the revelation that Anakin Skywalker was destined to bring balance to the Force by destroying the Sith, Dark Empire has been criticized for contradicting the prophecy of the Chosen One and Anakin's killing of Palpatine.
_	Although sickened with the revelation that her hated rival was pregnant with her child, Cassie had no choice but to accept the situation.
_	Jack resented - and even harassed - Steve and Kayla, but the revelation that he was Steve's brother and that his own father Harper had been a serial killer (who had tried to poison Kayla) would change his life, eventually for the better.
_	Donald refers to her as "Mrs. B" and the two do not get along at first though when the kids are kidnapped by the Beagle Boys they join forces and eventually gain respect for each other, albeit Donald is uncomfortable with the revelation that Beakley is a trained spy.
_	Prego offers a humorous take on unplanned pregnancies, it follows the story of Emily (played by Katie Vincent), a young woman confronting a one-night stand (played by Taso Mikroulis) with the revelation that she's pregnant.
_	More shocking than Tilden's being caught was the revelation that "sports and homosexuality were not mutually exclusive".
_	Norman's claims followed the revelation that an engineer from the NSA had visited New Zealand earlier in the year to discuss how to intercept traffic on the Southern Cross cable.
_	This episode would have ended with the revelation that the Doctor had caused it.
_	The play concludes with the revelation that Luckless's landlady is in reality the Queen of "Old Brentford" and that her daughter, Harriot, is now royalty.
_	The "Clone Saga" culminated with the revelation that the Spider-Man who had appeared in the previous 20 years of comics was a clone of the real Spider-Man.
_	However, Kirk supports Julie after the revelation that Colin Grimshaw (Edward DeSouza), Eileen's (Sue Cleaver) father, is also her father.
_	The second episode concluded with the revelation that Raf di Lucca (Joe McFadden) had also been shot and killed.
_	Cumpkin, which became a regular catchphrase, started life as an accidental mispronunciation of "pumpkin" by Herring as "cumpkin" and was mentioned in subsequent shows after the revelation that "cumpkin" is listed in the Urban Dictionary referring to a sexual fetish involving at least five men.
_	The film ends with a series of clips showing the aftermath of the disaster, including testimony from the real-life Mike Williams and the revelation that not a single employee of either Transocean or BP was prosecuted for their actions.
_	A notable incident included the revelation that the controversy may have involved the office of the Premier of Quebec, when it emerged that Paul Desrochers, Bourassa's special executive assistant had met with the union boss André Desjardins, known as the "King of Construction", to ask for his help with winning a by-election in exchange guaranteeing that only companies employing workers from his union would work on the James Bay project.
_	When they are caught lip-synching before the release of their first album, scandal erupts (fed also by their manager's physically assaulting an elderly male and an elderly female member of the Salvation Army and the revelation that M*Pete's 16-year-old girlfriend is actually only 12) and they are dropped by their record company.
_	However, his faith is ultimately shaken with the revelation that Venom Snake is actually Big Boss's body double as part of a plan to wage a covert war.
_	The episode focuses on Steven Universe confronting Pearl with questions about the supposed assassination of Pink Diamond millennia ago, and builds to a major plot twist for the series: the revelation that Steven's mother Rose Quartz was actually Pink Diamond herself, who faked her death with Pearl's assistance.
_	With the revelation that Pennyroyal is a fraud, the inhabitants lose hope in the salvation of their city, until Caul arrives with the Reykjavik map, and convinces them to continue.
_	The storyline led to the revelation that Irene was also sexually abused when she was younger, and had given birth to a child that was adopted out.
_	After the revelation that Jill was Cane's mother, his views changed, saying he "now welcomed the information as it added more color to his portrayal".
_	The book ends with the revelation that Hillary, a female leader of the Children, has become a new queen after Marie's death and is being cared for by some of the remaining Children.
_	The layers of the controversy have nonetheless deepened with the revelation that Ayad Allawi, the initial source of the Habbush letter, was at CIA headquarters the week before the letter emerged, and a piece in "The American Conservative" by Philip Giraldi that claims an "extremely reliable and well placed source in the intelligence community" confirmed that the Vice President's Office was behind the Habbush letter, but that "Doug Feith's Office of Special Plans", not the CIA, carried out the forgery.
_	At the conclusion of the episode, Shepherd visits Montgomery in her hotel room, in order to share his final thoughts on their upcoming divorce, but is shocked at the revelation that she had sex with Mark Sloan (Eric Dane).
_	Akins dies in surgery, but the situation is clouded by the revelation that it was Reynolds' stepson, Nick, portrayed by Ralph Reed, not Akins, who was responsible for the killing of popular townsman Tom Menken, played by Frank Ferguson.
_	The return of Adam Chandler and Brooke English coincided with the revelation that David had somehow resurrected Stuart Chandler.
_	Her relationship with Erica, which has grown closer over the previous months, is again strained because of the marriage to Michael, his murder, and the revelation that Bianca is pregnant with his child.
_	Mystique's sanity is further damaged by the revelation that Destiny was one of the founding members of the anti-mutant conspiracy Mystique had dedicated countless years to fighting, and had willfully withheld medical treatment to mutant children that would have resulted in them not growing up deformed due to their mutations.
_	Meanwhile, Amanda turns to junk food and to Marc in dealing with the revelation that Fey Sommers was her real mother.
_	Whilst the allegations regarding the News of the World continued to receive coverage in the broadsheets and similar media (Grant appeared for example on BBC Radio 4) it was only with the revelation that the voicemail of the then missing and subsequently murdered Millie Dowler had been hacked, and evidence in her murder enquiry had been deleted, that the coverage turned from media interest to widespread public (and eventually political) outrage.
_	Following the revelation that then-president Francois Mitterand and former high ranking Vichy member Rene Bousquet had a friendship, Hamon resigned as the leader of the Young Socialists.
_	Sara is shocked by the revelation that Ryan is not the man he made himself out to be.
_	IGN's Joe Utichi called Dumbledore his third favourite "Harry Potter" character, calling the revelation that he wasn't so "infallible" one of the most heartbreaking themes of the final book.
_	Stacey, Clay, Curtis, Cabot, Isabelle, and Jeremy lost their lives, culminating in the revelation that an insane Gwyn had murdered most of her friends and family in a bid to "make their pain go away".
_	These include the revelation that the horoscopes are written by the God of Astrology.
_	Adding to the threat is the revelation that the Collectors are working for the Reapers.
_	With the revelation that Scully is pregnant at the end of the seventh season finale, "Requiem", the concept revolving around Scully as a mother took center stage in seasons eight and nine with the birth of baby William.
_	Hurley's statement contained the revelation that many of Meagher's ABC colleagues had sought counselling from the ABC's employee assistance program because of her death.
_	Jude tells Lionel that he is seeing another man, and the revelation that Jude is gay cements a bond with Lionel.
_	The severity of the incident was further compounded by the revelation that the event-- which was not broadcast on television-- had been filmed by two fans, Mani Mohtadi and Jason Cosmides, who had smuggled a camcorder past security.
_	New information provided includes the revelation that John Brown's boat, "The Hannah", was newly returned from a voyage to Africa and that the attack had occurred concurrently with a major decision in the British Parliament regarding the abolition of slavery, emphasizing that the colonists were greatly concerned that the freeing of Africans would result in violent retribution on the part of freed slaves.
_	Franco's return brought about the revelation that his biological parents are Scott Baldwin (Kin Shriner) and Heather Webber (Robin Mattson).
_	this disconnection is underlined by the revelation that Mr Deansman has been pushing for Freddie to join the Navy.
_	While she claims she was trying to keep the team level headed and calm, the revelation that Apparition was merely a psychic illusion designed to pacify Ultra Boy turn the group against Saturn Girl.
_	Following the revelation that the Terrigen Cloud that is covering Earth is poisonous to mutants, Storm's team began using Dani's death-tracking abilities that she possesses thanks to her role as an Asgardian Valkyrie to track down those who are afflicted with the M-Pox and gets them to Storm's X-Haven located in the Limbo dimension.
_	His remark was prompted by the revelation that nearly half the race discrimination cases outstanding against the Met had been brought by white officers.
_	The story ends with the revelation that, 50 years later, another message is received from the Crab Nebula.
_	She then develops the Velocity serum with Harry Wells to cure Garricks's revealed illness, before the revelation that the so-called Flash of Earth-2 is in fact the evil Earth-2 speedster Zoom.
_	Chad Harris-Crane's affair with Vincent and subsequent confusion about his sexual orientation, Simone's coming out as lesbian to her family, and the revelation that Vincent was intersex.
_	Writing for "The Independent", Memphis Barker described Twitter as 'devastated' by the revelation that the account was human-run.
_	Sheriff Andrew Jackson (Lenny Von Dohlen) rules the death an accident, but Shawn receives the Dewey Decimal Classification number of a book, "Reincarnation and Rebirth", the title of which parallels the revelation that Paula had supposedly drowned in Santa Barbara, California seven years earlier, though her body was never found.
_	Ella kills Jez and makes it look like suicide, precipitated by the revelation that he was having an affair with a student, which deeply affects Roxanne, who felt responsible because she had seduced him.
_	In 'Oh, Future' Emmett's father surprises his guests at a housewarming party with a wedding and the revelation that Emmett is to become a big brother.
_	Part of the group that went to looking for Vito Spatafore at his mistress's beach house following the revelation that he was homosexual.
_	Although he initially led the party's criticism of the Koizumi administration, particularly in regards to connections between LDP lawmakers and scandal-ridden Livedoor, the revelation that a fake email was used to try to establish this link greatly damaged his credibility.
_	Alexander had the revelation that regardless of culture, social standing, religion and nationality that every person, every human on earth faced the same problems, in varying degrees in his journey down life's path.
_	Dean was the childhood love of Moira Crombie (Geraldine Brophy), however the clinic were shocked with the revelation that Moira had spent time in prison for crime Dean committed.
_	This was sparked by the revelation that the former Finance Minister for whom Erdene had staffed, Bayartsogt Sangajav, had accumulated over $1 million in a Swiss bank account; coverage of this had emerged in the international media that year.
_	The series, under Geoff Johns, also dramatically retconned Superboy's origin with the revelation that he was a hybrid clone based on the combined DNA of Superman and Lex Luthor.
_	A hangman, a prostitute, a thief and a drunk try to make some sense out of the revelation that they are the last four people on earth.
_	This Is Your Life moments (such as the return of Georgina Sparks and Blair's old minions Izzy and Kati), the wry references to episodes past, the wrapping up of story lines (including the revelation that Dan has been secretly novelizing his observations of the Upper East Side for the entire time we've thought we've "known" him), and the meaningful departure of its most marketable star to none other than Hollywood."
_	Subplots and events common to both sides include the takeover of Eden by a totalitarian, eugenics obsessed regime, a race to salvage data and components from the original starship, the fight for possession of the Gene Banks, and the revelation that the bio-electronic "Savant" sentient computers relied on by both sides are absorbed intact in to the Blight and replicate, making the Blight-conquered New Terra a paradise for them.
_	The woman denies this initially, before rebuking her newsbearer (a girlfriend) with the revelation that she "knew before" and had done for some time.
_	Hutchinson is not a fan of the revelation that Laurie and Michael are siblings and took steps to address that problem in the story.
_	Elderly members of the community who had formerly lived in the cottages on the site visited the excavation, providing "likely and amusing comments" following the revelation that they had dwelt above a cemetery.
_	Other key differences between the series and film include the absence of Nanami (save for a brief cameo in her cow incarnation) and the revelation that Akio is also dead before the film begins.
_	Osborn hopes that the revelation that his life was a lie would make Parker give up; instead both Parker and Reilly see this as a chance to start again.
_	Following the revelation that Sarah Potts (Amanda Billing) was Daniel's (Jarred Blakiston) sister, Daniel began to act out in an attempt to find out his fathers identity.
_	Over the course of the original series, however, the element of risk was no longer mentioned, although it was revived on "Star Trek: Enterprise" with the revelation that "Pa'nar" Syndrome can be transmitted this way.
_	I-RMS attracted considerable media attention following the revelation that a former employee, Michael Dwyer, shot dead by Bolivian police in April 2009, had worked for the firm, as a team leader, on the Shell Corrib project.
_	The book "Videogames and Art" noted that in the original "Metroid" the player is not briefed on Samus's past or future; the only interaction that they have with the character is by being her through gameplay, while bits of information can be gleaned from the handbook and through concept art, adding, "Samus is very rare for the character intimacy gained solely through game play and for her stasis and then drastic change," referring to the revelation that she is a woman.
_	Another well known example of anagnorisis from popular culture is the revelation that Darth Vader is the father of Luke Skywalker in "The Empire Strikes Back".
_	Being the only pig to survive, and with the revelation that, even while as crew aboard the space-yacht, he was a slave to human masters, Scorpio develops an intense hatred of humankind which drives his rise to infamy, becoming a feared figure in the Rust Belt.
_	The first two times the chorus is heard, it foreshadows the song's ending with the revelation that the mayor's daughter may be traveling overseas:
_	While Garrett relocates Hydra's operations to a new Cybertek facility in the US, Raina reveals extensive information to Ward regarding Skye's origins, including the revelation that Skye's parents were the 'monsters' which killed the villagers protecting her.
_	The boy recovers and returns to Earth with Titania's curses in his ears, having to come to terms with the revelation that the people he thought of as his parents - a mother who died in a car crash caused by his one-armed, grieving father - might be no relation to him at all.
_	This version of the team is clearly distinct from the one that was presented in "Legion of Super-Heroes" vol. 5; their appearance is a result of the "Infinite Crisis" and "52" limited series, and the revelation that there are 52 parallel universes in the DC Multiverse.
_	It was largely he who researched and organized the mountains of files culled from the sub-basement of the Bureau's new base in the Colorado mountains, resulting in the revelation that Ben Daimio's grandmother had been a Nazi occult war criminal.
_	It was also pointed out that the shootings, and the revelation that the perpetrator was someone Ziva had known since childhood, would affect the relationships of certain characters: "It certainly raises the point of who [Ziva] can trust and who she holds close.
_	It contained the revelation that unknown to fans and media alike, Dylan had married one of his backing singers, Carolyn Dennis.
_	"52" concluded with the revelation that the Multiverse (a storytelling device which posits the existence of alternative realities) exists, and which now serves as a backdrop to several stories in "Countdown".
_	The government was astonished by the revelation that Boulanger had received around 100,000 votes for the partial election in Seine, without even being a candidate.
_	Due to the revelation that Charleston had supplied improperly sized basketballs in its home conference wins over William & Mary and UNCW, the CAA announced on February 2 that those games would be treated as Charleston losses for purposes of CAA tournament seeding, although they still count as Charleston wins for all other purposes.
_	Even more humiliating is the revelation that he was wearing spangled tights at the time, exacerbating Perry's fear that he'll be mocked about this case for the rest of his life.
_	Dekar, now with a healthy respect for the mask, cautiously touches it and is given a vision of its history, along with the revelation that the Pit's waters are eroding it away and damaging it.
_	Abi Branning (Lorna Fitzgerald) tracks down her step grandmother Dot Branning (June Brown), who has been living away from Walford with her granddaughter Dotty Cotton, following the revelation that her father Max has a secret wife, Kirsty, and the fallout it had caused for her family, including Max's current fiance/ex-wife and Abi's mother Tanya.
_	Fearing the revelation that America's favorite TV programs were being picked by a primate would spell the end of television, the executives decide to steal the chimpanzee and return it to the jungle.
_	After the initial shock at the revelation that they are siblings, Tromeo and Juliet are determined not to let their whole ordeal be for naught; they passionately embrace and drive off into the sunset.
_	This was most clearly revealed when confronted by his former lover, Ilsa, and later by the revelation that his mentor had turned rogue.
_	According to author Timothy Miller, “the Kwan Um organization has had to struggle with disclosures of controversial sexual conduct on the part of its leader; Seung Sahn was generally understood by his followers to be a celibate monk, and the revelation that he had had affairs with female students caused some members to leave the movement.
_	That eventually lead to the revelation that his carving vehicles could also be used on flat surfaces and that they possessed the potential to provide a much more strenuous yet safe alternative to bikes, skateboards and other scooters.
_	The crackdown in France began in earnest after the revelation that Jerome Cahuzac, who served as budget director in the government of President Francois Hollande, had a secret Swiss bank account.
_	More tragedy was to hit the family when Zak's son, Sam, announced his girlfriend Alice Wilson was pregnant – only for that news to be followed by the revelation that Alice had cancer.
_	Diana confronted Hippolyta as to why she looked exactly like her aunt and with the revelation that she knew about Antiope and Hippolyta's last meeting.
_	"" was withdrawn from sale in July 2005 following the revelation that interactive sex scenes were included in the content files on the game's disc; one could not ordinarily access these scenes, but a third party modification, known as the Hot Coffee mod, allowed the player to access these scenes within the game itself, and the inclusion of the scenes on the game disc took the game outside the MA15+ category.
_	She fears that since it is QA's job to oversee all of the other departments, the revelation that she is sleeping with the head of the Behavior department could create a conflict of interest and hurt her credibility in the eyes of the Board.
_	The character's early storylines focused on her friendship with VJ Patterson (Little), a feud with villain Charlotte King (Erika Heynatz), and the revelation that she has been self-harming due to being sexually abused.
_	However, a big surprise was the revelation that the RD600 was based on a version of the RD480 or the Xpress 1600 chipset.
_	After numerous trials and tribulations (including a sadistic rape) the revelation that the brush salesman was lying, and a Papal assassination, the family finds itself exiled in Iceland, where it appears Eleanor's nightmare will only continue.
_	Prior to the release, "Season Eight" artist Georges Jeanty had mocked up a spoof cover depicting the revelation that Twilight was US President Barack Obama.
_	His labours have unearthed some intriguing material, including the revelation that Livingstone has fathered five children by three different women...
_	Amongst the court documents was the revelation that Yee knew that the contents of his blogs and videos would be offensive, but went ahead with posting them.
_	The episode would have opened with the revelation that Stroker and Hoop died in the crash and were sent to the afterlife; Hoop, specifically, was sent to a section of Hell reserved for lettuce, on a technicality.
_	Although he enjoyed the interaction among the main cast, Osborn was confused by the revelation that Allen would become the 14th Noah and had to watch the scene again in order to understand it.
_	She reveals that Samir is still married and his wife is in coma after a suicide attempt, caused by the revelation that Samir and Marie were conducting an affair.
_	In 2011, the University of Durham's ethical reputation was called into question by the revelation that a donation of £125,000 had been accepted from British American Tobacco despite the involvement of members of the university's department of anthropology, School of Applied Social Sciences and medical school in the tobacco control field.
_	Further increasing fanning the flames of the criticism was the revelation that Hoggan had received his research funds from and that he himself was a member of several neo-Nazi groups in the United States and West Germany, and the charge that Hoggan had wilfully misinterpreted and falsified historical evidence to fit his argument.
_	The reviewer found the plot involving T'raltixx less interesting but enjoyed "the revelation that Crichton's ability to fight the problem was down to his deficiencies rather than just down to his being the series lead."
_	After the revelation that Grodd's ultimate plan in the creation of the new Secret Society was the ludicrous transformation of humanity into apes, Lex Luthor ousted him and assumed the position as leader with no objections from the membership (Luthor states he had planned this for a later time anyway).
_	The storyline saw Cal struggle to come to terms with the revelation that he and Ethan are adopted.
_	Many of the characters were upgraded into new "Transmetal" forms, and the conflict reached a new level with an exceptionally tightly-plotted story arc that included the revelation that the planet was Earth, the death of Dinobot and more alien conflicts.
_	Sarah and Shaw are ordered to track down the Director by Beckman, but Chuck has misgivings over whether Shaw can be trusted after the revelation that Sarah killed his wife.
_	Her return on September 8, 1986, which proved to be permanent, opened with the revelation that she had been having financial difficulty – the number one indication that for once, she had not run off to marry another wealthy bachelor to advance her fortune.
_	The story begins with the revelation that Seattle, Washington is being plagued by a string of murders, which Edward suspects is caused by a new vampire that is unable to control its thirst for human blood.
_	Strike is dumbstruck by the revelation that Robin was raped and left for dead by an unknown attacker, but still manages to be impressed when she tells him that her evidence resulted in the rapist being convicted.
_	In "Vaulting Ambition", Burnham and Lorca are transported to the ISS Charon, as the revelation that Georgiou is the emperor weighs down on her, making her feel the situation is a reckoning for her betrayal of her own Georgiou.
_	Initial reports that the neck wound was from a self-inflicted gunshot from a possible suicide attempt were later contradicted by the revelation that he was unarmed at the time of capture and a description of the neck wound by SWAT team members that it was a slicing injury, possibly caused by shrapnel from an explosion.
_	Leo and David's search ended in the revelation that the show's villainous character, Paul Robinson (Stefan Dennis) was their father.
_	In 1912, he resigned in disgrace after the revelation that he was involved in an extramarital affair with his Swedish secretary.
_	Following the revelation that only 1,411 Bengal tigers existed in the wild in India, down from 3,600 in 2003, the Indian government set up eight new tiger reserves.
_	The story ends with the revelation that Don Clericuzio planned this outcome, even anticipating his grandson's death, all along, for the long-term survival of his family.
_	Kurt finding himself in competition with Blaine was also touched on, but several reviewers were unhappy with the revelation that Blaine was not a senior like Kurt, as had been implied in the previous season.
_	Archbishop Rembert Weakland of Milwaukee, Wisconsin retired on May 24, 2002 following the revelation that he had used $450,000 in archdiocesan funds to settle a lawsuit accusing him of sexual harassment.
_	She dotes on her son but is faced with the revelation that her husband is cheating on her and the exasperation of her son, who feels suffocated by her love.
_	Furthermore, they negatively wrote about the revelation that Mulder was suffering from a terminal brain disease, calling it a "monumental story" curve that did not bother "to connect all the dots behind" it.
_	Questions were raised about her suitability for the show because of her "racy past", as well as the revelation that she had previously applied, numerous times, for reality show "Big Brother".
_	In 2016, following the revelation that he had been reprimanded for sexual harassment in his former position at ISU, Maschner was demoted from his post as director of CVAST.
_	Both it and "The Goose Girl" turn on the revelation that the true royal has been supplanted by a treacherous servant.
_	Nick, flustered by the revelation that he's now married to two women, makes great effort to keep the truth from his new wife all the while trying to quash her amorous advances.
_	While Jarvis was shown dating May Parker during Spider-Man's initial career in the New Avengers, this relationship has been negated by the revelation that the man that May had dated was a Skrull impostor.
_	Since that time much of the media focus involving his career has concentrated on the revelation that between 1967 and 1989 he provided information to the Ministry for State Security as an informal collaborator.
_	The news upsets the balance in the Evans household, and his relationship with Barry severely suffers as he is devastated to learn that his father was unfaithful to his dead mother, as well as the revelation that he had a brother he knew nothing about.
_	The essential and relevant part of the book is the revelation that Franz Bardon was the last reincarnation of the spirit embodied by Hermes Trismegistus, the esoteric creator of Hermeticism and the founder of Freemasonry, who, contrary to what Freemasons think, paid the karma that Generated when he lived as Hermes Trismegistus, because the masonic idea of how the Laws of the Universe work (The Law of God or Divine Justice) does not correspond to the ideas of Bardon.
_	It shortly followed that with the revelation that Google CEO Eric Schmidt had an apparently open marriage and had joined a church (as documented on a Web page in Google's cache) with a girlfriend.
_	After a terrible accident and the revelation that her father is a priest of Naamah, Moirin sets sail for Terre d'Ange in search of a destiny her bear-goddess has foretold.
_	Following Blackblood's recounting of his Volgan War experiences and the revelation that he tried to kill Lara, Mongrol went berserk and stated that, at the end of that mission, either Blackblood leaves the Warriors or he will.
_	Like many Gnostic works, the Gospel of Judas refers to itself as a secret account, specifically "The secret account of the revelation that Jesus spoke in conversation with Judas Iscariot..."
_	(His continuing interest in Billy Hughes led some years later to the revelation that Hughes's daughter Helen had died in childbirth in London; in 2004 he presented an ABC program on the story.)
_	"The Sirens of Titan" largely deals with questions of free will, with multiple characters being stripped of it and the revelation that humanity had been secretly manipulated for millennia for an inane purpose playing major roles in the story.
_	Executive producer and co-creator Jeri Taylor described "Elogium" as a fitting end to that season "because it leaves us with the revelation that someone aboard the "U.S.S. Voyager" is pregnant!"
_	Bab succumbs to the measles and the revelation that Adrian is married completely shatters her thoughts of romance, at least for the time being.
_	"Memorial del engaño" is about the financial crisis of 2008 and the revelation that much of the world economic order was due to communist spies.
_	But after the handsome foreigner weathered the revelation that his lover wasn't actually a countess – bless him for believing!
_	Most lately, Casey's beginnings, along with the revelation that John Casey was not his birth name, was hinted in during "Chuck Versus the Fake Name" before being revealed in "Chuck Versus the Tic Tac", along with significant present-storyline development, including his dismissal from government employment.
_	After the revelation that Kaye was a teacher appeared in mainstream news publications, Kaye made a WWE second appearance on the July 11, 2005 episode of "Raw" to face Angle for a second time.
_	This ended with the revelation that Pete was actually her father.
_	The film contains several inside jokes, including Gaynor's brief imitations of Greta Garbo, Katharine Hepburn, and Mae West; the "Crawford Smear", referring to Joan Crawford's lipstick; and the revelation that the glamorous Norman Maine's real last name is Hinkle.
_	The series was officially announced by the UFC in March 2013 with the revelation that for the first time women will serve as coaches and the contestants will be both male and female.
_	In his absence, the writing staff rewrote the last quarter of the segment and added the revelation that Flanders is a werewolf.
_	Gabe then demands an answer for his commander's seemingly random act of violence, leading to the revelation that Gabe's wife Lexine is on the list of key subjects to terminate because of her involvement in the "Oracle program", which has something to do with Lexine's recent pregnancy.
_	This leads to the revelation that Mac physically abused James when he was child and hates the fact that he is gay.
_	Pistone later speculated Massino also feared retaliation upon the revelation that his associate, Raymond Wean, had turned state's evidence.
_	After a decade in American films, she starred in Roberto Rossellini's "Stromboli" (1950), following the revelation that she was having an extramarital affair with the director.
_	The second season began in the fall of 1977 with the revelation that Tom had become a widower.
_	Hank's montage, in which he investigates the revelation that Walt is Heisenberg, sees him looking through old case files and pictures.
_	Blair kicks out Dan and finds Serena reluctant to see him go, not only finding dirt that she could use to ruin Eva but the revelation that Serena chose Dan when she intended to make a choice after Paris.
_	It featured the revelation that James had been violently beaten as a child by his father Mac.
_	This series also featured the long triangle between Sophia, Francis and Proudlock, the rivalry between Millie and Victoria increasing, the brief reconnection between Gabriella and Ollie, and the rocky relationship between Spencer and Louise until the revelation that he cheated on her.
_	Both the US Central Intelligence Agency and Federal Bureau of Investigation were embarrassed by the revelation that a high-ranking NKVD officer (Orlov was a Major of State Security, equal to an army colonel) had been living underground in the United States for 15 years without their knowledge.
_	His reaction is eventually explained with the revelation that his brother David, recently diagnosed with terminal cancer, committed suicide rather than live what time he had left: "He could have had years.
_	The arrest led to the revelation that he had maintained a longtime adulterous relationship with a woman in Virginia, with whom he had a child.
_	The reporter said that Anna would arrive in "Hollyoaks" with the revelation that Patrick has abused her, an accusation which he denies.
_	Kim and Kit share a kiss, and following the revelation that Rachel slept with Hugh Sullivan (Rodger Corser), Kim decides to leave her and be with Kit and baby Archie in the city.
_	Serafina is still stinging from the revelation that her husband was unfaithful.
_	Tyler is angry at Jack for not selecting him as the gold medalist, and is threatening to go public with the revelation that there was no Olympic tetherball competition during the 2008 Summer Olympics, as it was staged to boost NBC's ratings.
_	Paolini's announcement of the book's publishing date included the revelation that the Inheritance Trilogy would now contain four books instead of three, thus resulting in the renaming of the series to the Inheritance Cycle.
_	Subsequently, in "Mini", Mini continues to distance herself from her friends after Grace's death, while continuing her 'no-strings-attached' relationship with Alo, but is hit further by the revelation that she is pregnant with Alo's baby.
_	Little was made at the time of the revelation that AGLOSO was nothing new; in fact, the government had been keeping a secret list to aid in screening for federal employee loyalty since 1940.
_	Various other aborted meals ensue; interruptions include the arrival of a group of French army officers who join the dinner, or the revelation that a French colonel's dining room is in fact a stage set in a theatrical performance, during a dream sequence.
_	The series picks up several weeks following the revelation that Fenner had framed Karen Betts in the hit-and-run.
_	On October 3, 2010, the final strip ran, with the revelation that Cathy is pregnant with a girl.
_	The series ends with the awakening of a new megadeus, and the revelation that the world is a simulated reality.
_	Following this, and the revelation that Clay killed both John Teller and Piney Winston, Jax personally stripped Clay of his position as President as well as his membership in the Club.
_	After the revelation that Jack was their half-brother through their shared mother, Prose Page, they were horrified to realize that they'd committed incest.
_	Eric eventually leaves his wife for Beth, but what brings him back to the Forrester home (if not Stephanie's bed) is the revelation that he has a 24-year-old daughter he never knew: the microcephalic Angela.
_	At this time, he states, "As soon as we found out, we took action," referring to the revelation that some members of the Junior Order chapter were white power activists.
_	Heart broken by the revelation that she could never marry her love, Ganga quietly goes to the pond, jumps into it and dies while her mother watches from a distance.
_	However the revelation that Guy had cheated on Meredith with Jenny (Maggie Harper) separated the two and Meredith got shot by a crazed patient.
_	Del and Rodney, who had since become millionaires regretted not having taken him with them, but were consoled by the revelation that the "Ancient Mariner" never actually held a passport and at the same time showing up at the wrong funeral to someone else called Albert.
_	The season focuses on the revelation that David Clarke is alive and the continued feud between Emily and Victoria, who finally knows Emily's true identity and seeks her own revenge.
_	He added, "It could have worked out, but besides the revelation that Linden was engaged to her old psychiatrist, which raises a few questions that have nothing to do with the main storyline, it gives us nothing new besides a connection between several of the key suspects, which could have been integrated into just about any episode of the series."
_	In a decisive game, he fails to keep a ball and is then evicted from the team, with his mistake being used to cover the real reason—the revelation that he is gay that comes about when he is observed by some of his teammates kissing another man on the mouth.
_	After the revelation that Tousei is responsible for the Horrors in Vol City, learning that he is human, Ryuga is once more portrayed as a terrorist along with the rest of his group.
_	Complicating the governor's position was the revelation that Brayman had authorized Bannock leader Buffalo Horn, a former army scout with a history of aiding the U.S. government, to purchase US$2 worth of ammunition (roughly 100 bullets and a pound of black powder) 13 days before outbreak of hostilities.
_	The members were arrested in 2005 leading to the revelation that Gambino acting capo DePalma had allowed an FBI agent Joaquín García (known as Jack Falcone) work undercover with his crew since 2002.
_	The novel closes with a return to 1985 and the revelation that Wilson was responsible for the palindrome murders, hiding trophies from each victim in his record collection.
_	Their loss, and the revelation that God will not help stop the Apocalypse, drives Dean to agree to act as the vessel of Michael, but, ultimately, he doesn't go through with it.
_	In the book "Representing Multiculturalism in Comics and Graphic Novels", Jacob Birken wrote that Allen's use of his powers illustrates the series' theme of identity; although Allen seems to become more human through his Innocence, the revelation that he is the 14th Noah mutes that humanity.
_	Therefore, the key turning point of the novel – the revelation that Max, in fact, murdered Rebecca – was altered so that it seemed as if Rebecca's death was accidental.
_	The opera ends with the revelation that Elsa is actually a patient in a psychiatric ward.
_	The characters separated but reconciled later in the year when Ricky supported Bianca through a personal crisis – the revelation that she had unknowingly tried to seduce her estranged father David Wicks (Michael French).
_	The novel opens with the revelation that the United States has just elected into power Abe Stein, its first openly gay (and Jewish) president.
_	On July 25, 2016, Anthony Zurcher, North America reporter for the BBC, commented that "the revelation that those in the heart of the Democratic establishment sought to undermine the anti-establishment Sanders is roughly on a par with ["Casablanca" character] police Capt Renault's professed shock that gambling was taking place in the Casablanca club he was raiding, as a waiter hands him his winnings."
_	Following the revelation that Nick Fury has been secretly protecting Earth from various alien threats for years using more brutal methods than the heroes would have condoned, as well as the revelation that he killed the Watcher in self-defense and used the Watcher's eye to find the identity of his attacker when Uatu refused to break his oath and reveal that information himself, Fury now acts as the Watcher's replacement while Bucky takes over Fury's role as Earth's more ruthless guardian.
_	Following on from the revelation that Sally Langston had murdered her husband, Daniel Douglas, a flashback reveals what led up to this turn of events.
_	Moreover, Creed and Tony (along with Rocky's wife Adrian) also help to rebuild Rocky's self-esteem, which is left shattered after his knockout by Lang and the revelation that Mickey had handpicked some of his prior opponents in an effort to prevent him from serious injury, and to keep him winning.
_	And second, because the revelation that a 7.9 (the equivalent of a C-plus) is an acceptable sex grade is great news for sexual underachievers everywhere!"
_	The natives are receptive to the fulfillment of the prophecies even after the revelation that Phyllis's decanonization resulted in her prophecies being discredited.
_	Dwayne and Whitley also visited the Huxtable home in an episode featuring the revelation that Denise had married and would not return to Hillman.
_	His return to the authorities' good books was evident when in 1964 the ruling party's organ "Neues Deutschland" carried the revelation that the otherwise unknown Li De, involved in the Chinese Long March of the 1930s, had been in fact none other than the German Otto Braun.
_	"In essence, "Chapter One: The River’s Edge" doesn't exactly feel like a proper representation of what we'll get from a full season of "Riverdale", as the procedural elements, such as the revelation that Archie and Ms. Grundy heard a gunshot in the woods the morning after their tryst, barely make themselves known here.
_	The Japanese commander at the scene, Ryuichiro Kishitani (岸谷隆一郎), was so shocked at the revelation that he "went silent, and appeared aged a lot within the next day."
_	According to series regular David Krumholtz, fans were so outraged by the revelation that they expressed disapproval of other things about the series.
_	Far from making his jaw drop and his pulse race, the revelation that DNA was a simple a twisting helix would therefore have been a disappointment but it is intriguing to speculate on how differently history might have unfolded had Astbury shown Beighton's image to his friend and colleague the eminent US chemist and Nobel Laureate, Linus Pauling when he visited Astbury at his home in Headingley, Leeds in 1952.
_	Speaking on the revelation that the Chagos Islands may have been used for torture, Vincatassin said: "Our homeland should only be used for good purposes, not as a second Guantanamo Bay with no set of rules or laws like other countries."
_	Sacred Scripture and Sacred Tradition (not these changeable traditions) must be accepted and honoured with equal devotion and reverence, since they are both modes of transmission of the revelation that comes from a single divine source and make up "a single sacred deposit of the Word of God".
_	After losing to Kazuki and explaining his plight, which includes the revelation that the members of Fuuga are trapped in the cocoon, Saizou tore his heart out, which liberated the captives.
_	Aquino later stated that the revelation that Satan was Set necessitated his own exploration of Egyptology, a subject about which he had previously known comparatively little.
_	With the revelation that Black Bolt did not die but was instead trapped in the fault, Vulcan's fate remains unknown.
_	Mahler was at the height of his compositional powers, but his personal life was in complete disarray, most recently compounded by the revelation that his young wife, Alma, had had an affair with the architect Walter Gropius.
_	When asked about the shifts people take in the clock tower, Deanna replies with the revelation that the town has no official lookout, which surprises and angers Rick.
_	In January 2018, following the revelation that he used taxpayers' money to settle a sexual harassment claim brought by a female staff member, Meehan announced that he would retire from Congress at the end of his current term, and not seek re-election in 2018.
_	Characterised in earlier publications as clandestine and inscrutable, the book constitutes a major development of the entire canon of the setting with the revelation that the Legion's Primarch is actually a pair of twins, Alpharius and Omegon.
_	To further compound matter was the revelation that Mr. Paulwell had recently awarded a cellular licence to a company controlled by Ms. Palmer and her husband.
_	According to Herman and Rutman, the revelation that "CB Projects Spicerack and Summit were directly connected with U.S. military activities in Southeast Asia", caused students to petition Penn president Gaylord Harnwell to halt the program, citing the project as being "immoral, inhuman, illegal, and unbefitting of an academic institution".
_	Reeling from the revelation that everything he thought he knew about his life was a lie, Antonio spirals into despair and self-destructive behavior, breaking up with Jessica, resigning from the police force, and beginning a sexual relationship with Sonia Toledo.
_	Mickey, terrified by the revelation that alien life exists, fails to impress the Doctor, who only invites Rose to be his travelling companion in time and space.
_	It includes the revelation that Praline's first name is also Eric.
_	In August 2017, Faulkner was longlisted for Best Bad Girl at the Inside Soap Awards, while the revelation that Fi is associated with Max was longlisted for Best Shock Twist.
_	The series included the end of Spencer and Louise's relationship after the revelation that Spencer cheated, then both of their attempts to move on as Louise begins a new romance with Andy, and Spencer tries his luck with Lucy.
_	She claimed that he had attacked her following the revelation that she had defrauded him and had retaliated in self-defence.
_	A series of articles were published on the stimulus topic, initially examining the number of jobs created and the cost per-job, but the conversation turned to the revelation that $6.4 billion in grants had been awarded in 440 non-existent congressional districts:
_	Before the revelation that the Falstaff rockets were part of a nuclear program, anti-nuclear campaigners in Australia had believed that testing ended in 1963.
_	On the second day of the show, the British guest on exchange in the house, Jade Goody, walked out of the "Bigg Boss" house due to the revelation that she had developed cancer.
_	By now Alf is involved in a relationship with general store owner Ailsa, who he marries in 1988, despite the disapproval of his daughter Ruth (Roo) and the revelation that Ailsa was convicted of the murder of her abusive father.
_	She also teased the audience with the revelation that "Hollyoaks" had not actually aired Lynsey's final on-screen appearance.
_	When the four boys previously called Mrs. Kolbein, she dropped her phone and didn't hear the revelation that she had been pranked.
_	He ultimately sides with Kotal Kahn upon the revelation that Mileena is not the true heir to the throne, as she is a genetic creation and not Shao Kahn's biological daughter.
_	Omega Black has since reappeared too, with the revelation that she had become a vessel for Shadow King which the Crimson Pirates were supposed to give to Tullamore Voge.
_	Even on 'normal' days, however, she is pathetically inept: her attempt to teach chopstick usage to a generation of students raised on sporks ends with the revelation that she is unable to use them herself.
_	Distraught at the revelation that he had become a villain himself, Black made the supervillains forget Superman's secret identity.
_	When the press uncovered the fact that Charles had listed his current marital status as "single" on his marriage license, the revelation that the marriage between Alla and Charles had been a sham from the beginning embroiled Nazimova in a scandal that damaged her career.
_	The caller, in a frantic tone, claimed that the government is aware of specific information regarding upcoming natural disasters and not informing or preparing the public, in addition to the revelation that a 'previous space program' made contact with malevolent inter-dimensional beings who have since infiltrated our government and military establishments within the US, the radio network's satellite feed legitimately malfunctioned.
_	The detector was dropped as a method of exposing hidden Cylons early in Season 2 as the revelation that Boomer (a test subject) was a Cylon convinced the command staff that the detector did not work.
_	As Elektra is distracted by the revelation that Abby has martial arts skills, Typhoid gives Elektra the "Kiss of Death".
_	Iris comes to Atlanta for the holidays in "Rotten Things", and Sam is shocked by the revelation that Cristal killed his father Alejandro while defending Iris in Venezuela.
_	Julie surprisingly reanimates as a roamer, which causes the revelation that everyone is infected with the mysterious virus, regardless of being bitten or not.
_	After the revelation that Elle Gardner's youngest son is his, he steps down to become a band five staff nurse- allowing ED veteran, Senior Charge Nurse Charlie Fairhead to take his place.
_	Following the revelation that Banjawarn was owned by the Aum, there was also speculation in 1997 that this event might have been the result of a test explosion of a nuclear device they had built.
_	There's a Close Encounters reference, and the revelation that "The Internet" is just a giant router.
_	The editor of "The Columbus Dispatch", Luke Feck, embarrassed by the revelation that he and his paper were taken in by so obvious a fake, refused Randi permission to print the photos he had given him earlier, in an apparent attempt to suppress the evidence of Tina’s trickery and the newspaper’s credulity."
_	In a gunfight, one patron's head is obliterated, only to the revelation that it is a large mask worn by Buddy, who is taking part in the musical number.
_	Enraged at the revelation that he has spent two years blaming Roussel for "betraying" him when in reality the client's death was a sheer fluke, Bryce punches Kincaid and then abandons him.
_	After the revelation that her own father had broken her life and those of her friends, a heartbroken Nadia decides to fight Azh Rafir in his demon lord form in the story's climax.
_	In his multi-volume "Sir Francis Bacon's Cipher Story" (1893), he claimed to have discovered Bacon's autobiography embedded in Shakespeare's plays, including the revelation that Bacon was the secret son of Queen Elizabeth, thus providing more motivation to conceal his authorship from the public.
_	Controversy arose from the revelation that musician Ramon Santos had been dropped from the list of nominees short-listed in May that year by the selection committee, and four other individuals had been nominated to the title via "President’s prerogative":
_	The story culminates with the revelation that one of the personalities has escaped and headed off into Galactic Sector ZZ9 Plural Z Alpha, which is where Arthur and Ford Prefect were picked up by the "Heart of Gold" a fraction of second before they would have perished (and just minutes after they had been rescued from the demolished Earth in the same sector), in the original "Hitchhiker's Guide to the Galaxy".
_	Any chances of negotiation for the peaceful removal of remaining foreign players was quickly crushed by the revelation that some UN personnel had been planning to aid in a conspiracy to remove Tshombe from power, seize the radio station in Élisabethville, and apprehend his Gendarmes.
_	Romney's personal feuding with Perry, Newt Gingrich and Rick Santorum occupies a large portion of the story, including allegations that the Romney campaign had fostered rumors regarding Gingrich's request for an "open marriage" with his second wife shortly before divorcing her for his mistress, and the revelation that Santorum had brought a stillborn son home for his family to see.
_	It asserts to tell the story of Pavlowitch's literary experiences from his own perspective, and comments on the recent success with "The Life Before Us", the subsequent speculation that the author might be Gary, as well as explains his reclusiveness with the revelation that he has schizophrenia.
_	Furious over the revelation that the conspirators abused his trust and plotted his son's death, he had Su Wen burned alive, Jiang Chong's immediate and extended family executed, and killed every official who got promoted for tracking down the Crown Prince.
_	This relationship is solid until the revelation that Ted stole money from Gus' college fund.
_	While the company eventually claimed its intention all along had been to "bring awareness" and stimulate conversation about the plight of endangered species, the company faced backlash from the public both before and after the revelation that the campaign was a hoax, with a number of customers saying they would boycott the service.
_	Second, his "father" was over seventy when he was conceived, and required supplementary testosterone; instead of periodic injections, he chose to be transplanted with the testicles of an executed Colonist - the class schism between Colonist and Crew means that the two have effectively become distinct races, both of which consider miscegenation a greater taboo than incest - and the revelation that Jesus is half-Colonist disgusts her even more than the revelation that she and her fellow Colonists are nothing but cattle to the Crew; cattle that have just been completely culled.
_	In Matthew Kappell's book "Star Trek As Myth", he said that he felt that the revelation that the previous Vulcan administration was working with the Romulans all along "suddenly makes sense of years of previously incomprehensible Vulcan policy" and linked to "The Next Generation" episode "".
_	As many of Swedenborg's teachings disagree with what has been established as orthodox theology, they state that he received his information from evil spirits and that the revelation that Swedenborg's New Church has promoted is "among the most antibiblical and anti-Christian material ever printed."
_	Norman with the revelation that he is not being offered a position on the "Dark Avengers" team and that Norman had never planned on fulfilling his vow to resurrect the Thunderbolt's deceased sister or to give him a full presidential pardon after his contract with the Thunderbolts ended.
_	Pier 4, a waterfront warehouse, served as a temporary headquarters after Four Freedoms Plaza was destroyed by the ostensible superhero team the Thunderbolts shortly after the revelation that they were actually the supervillain team the Masters of Evil in disguise.
_	This also coincided with the revelation that death takes everyone in the end.
_	The latter of course denies all allegations, but Madeleine Lee is so shocked at the revelation that she turns down Ratcliffe's proposal of marriage.
_	Fake with the revelation that except for him (Snake), all of the participants in the game have a black butterfly tattoo on their wrists, marking them as The Baron's children although they had different mothers.
_	The storyline was furthered by the revelation that fellow X-Man Archangel's healing blood did not heal Nightcrawler, and in fact caused him great pain.
_	Following the Skrull invasion of Earth, and the revelation that the then-Joint Intelligence Committee chair person was in fact a Skrull impostor, Hunter was made the new JIC Chair.
_	Her campaign was seriously damaged during its final two months by the revelation that she had employed an illegal immigrant as a nanny and housekeeper, and by the alleged manner in which she treated (and fired) the housekeeper.
_	The name Bad Flirt was inspired mostly from the revelation that the band would be pretty bad in a general sense.
_	Following the revelation that Kent had replaced Johnny Rodz and Kent left the area, leaving Estrada as "Super Médico I" on his own.
_	Following the revelation that several Notre Dame player's had academically cheated during their time on the football team, the NCAA ruled that Notre Dame's wins from the 2012 and 2013 seasons would be vacated, including the Pinstripe Bowl win.
_	In the wake of the revelation that Prejean had made masturbation videos, NOM removed reference to the video from the front page of their website.
_	However, these feats were later tainted by the revelation that leading scorer Andy Moran had been taking the banned stimulant Nandrolone throughout the season.
_	1802 saw the revelation that the British Army was trafficking rum.
_	Mo-ne was shocked by the revelation that he had initially thought of her as a sister, but eventually comes to accept the important fact that he loves her nonetheless.
_	Among the most promising is the revelation that amphibians in colonies that survive the passage of the chytrid epidemic tend to carry higher levels of the bacterium "Janthinobacterium lividum".
_	Michele, from TV Equals, was disappointed of the lack of action of the episode, but was surprised by the revelation that Catherine was the one who had the idea for the scheme.
_	Over a year earlier the story "Pirates of the Black Atlantic" ended with the revelation that a seemingly independent nuclear attack on MC-1 had been the work of the Sov block, and East Meg one is forced to destroy one of its own sectors to appease Mega City One.
_	Volume three would take place after the events of "Nick Fury vs. S.H.I.E.L.D.", which Nick Fury rebuilding S.H.I.E.L.D. following the revelation that the agency had been subverted by a renegade group of evolved LMDs.
_	This leads to the revelation that she and Tom are behind on their premiums, caused by him losing a lot of money, including all of their savings, confirming House's theory that he was somehow betraying her.
_	This and other events, such as the revelation that British atomic bomb scientist Klaus Fuchs was a spy, led current and former members of HUAC to decry the Truman administration, especially the State Department, as soft on communism.
_	Kat wasted very little time in establishing herself as a drama queen by shocking everyone with the revelation that her youngest sister, Zoe was in fact her daughter.
_	However, Otho's initial efforts to restore peace and stability were soon checked by the revelation that Vitellius had declared himself Imperator in Germania and had dispatched half of his army to march on Italy.
_	He praised the primary plot, commenting that "the Liz storyline was unexpectedly moving, as Liz’s farcical attempts to get Tracy to come back [...] led to the revelation that Angie has been trying to get Tracy to come back to no avail".
_	Planned for the eleventh and twelfth episodes of the fifth series, it would have featured the revelation that Sky was the child of the Trickster, seen the return of Katy Manning as Jo Grant Jones and the destruction of Bannerman Road.
_	The following day, his astonishing testimony continued with the revelation that when Caroline and Pergami were travelling together in a carriage, Pergami kept a bottle with him so he could relieve himself without having to step down from the coach.
_	McGovern's campaign was further damaged by the revelation that his running mate, Thomas Eagleton, had undergone psychiatric electroshock therapy as a treatment for depression.
_	Perhaps most alarming is the revelation that boards, or board presidents desirous of acting contrary to law, their governing documents or to fundamental democratic principles, are unstoppable without extreme owner effort and often costly litigation.
_	Angela is disgusted at the revelation that Oscar is gay ("Gay Witch Hunt"), and does not bother to hide it.
_	On the revelation that Unicron was sealed inside the Earth's core, Kline said that "[they] knew" they had to include him in the series but were initially unsure how.
_	He gives her a bottle of champagne for her birthday, and they chat for a while about the nature of insanity, ending with the revelation that Robert died last week and his funeral is tomorrow.
_	He noted that the revelation that Lucy was just an innocent girl was a "nice twist", and deemed it a "great choice" to have Gordon turned into a vampire.
_	Claudius apathetically divorces Urgulanilla following this suspicion of murder and the revelation that his wife has a child with her slave.
_	The A.V. Club's Phil Dyess-Nugent gave the finale a B+ grade, stating, "The pieces fit, and the revelation that Skinner, the cop who put the wrongly convicted Ray Seward away, was actually covering up his own crimes, alters the story in a way that, if anything, makes more sense, not less."
_	In July 2011, following the revelation that the "News of the World" had paid private investigators to hack into the phones of Milly Dowler, as well as the families of murder victims and deceased servicemen, Miliband called for News International chief executive Rebekah Brooks to resign, urged David Cameron to establish a public, judge-led inquiry into the scandal, and announced that he would force a Commons vote on whether to block the News International bid for a controlling stake in BSkyB.
_	Nang Ping that he must return to Britain with his family, but she surprises him with the revelation that she carries his child.
_	The first night of the summer brings the revelation that the original owners of Camp Hope (Jerry Stiller and Anne Meara) have entered bankruptcy and the camp has been bought by fitness entrepreneur Tony Perkis (Ben Stiller), who announces his plan to make the camp's new exercise regimen into the top weight loss infomercial in the country.
_	Gandhi admitted to the same, following the revelation that the film was based on the life of Kalpana.
_	A neurotic mess, Jennifer can barely handle the news that Kip is a philanderer, let alone the revelation that she is a gangster's daughter.
_	In 2017, Pinho's record as a minister was shaken by the revelation that the whole time he was in office he had been receiving a monthly allowance totaling 795 thousand euros from his Espirito Santo Financial Group mentor Ricardo.
_	Her real name is Mysa Nal, although her name was given as Xola Aq in Silver Age Legion stories in "Adventure Comics"; the revelation that her name was actually Mysa Nal was a later retcon.
_	Following the revelation that the revolutionaries may have received communist bloc training, Operation Parthenon was replaced by Operation Boris.
_	This strikes him with the revelation that if he can't be a mercenary, he'll become a superhero.
_	In mid-2013, the paternity of Summer (now 18 years old) is questioned upon the revelation that Nick declared himself her father despite the initial paternity test being corrupt.
_	The Avengers become divided over how to approach Loki and the revelation that S.H.I.E.L.D. plans to harness the Tesseract to develop weapons.
_	Jwala's tuition teacher tries to misbehave with her but she's saved by Nisha which leads to the revelation that Nisha was a victim of child abuse when she was thirteen, after which she became a tomboy.
_	In 2015 Marvel Senior Vice President of Publishing and Executive Editor Tom Brevoort referred to Bleeding Cool when talking about the revelation that Marvel Entertainment CEO Isaac Perlmutter had personally intervened to cancel the Fantastic Four comics in his dispute with Fox Studios, saying "Seriously, if there wasn't a website stirring all of this stuff up, can you honestly say that you would even have noticed anything here?"
_	When it is recognized as a missing talisman of the royal family, this leads to the revelation that Firiel is the daughter of royalty and automatically in competition to become the next Queen.
_	Since the revelation that their biological father Frank Stockburn was no more than a two-bit crook, the Native chief decides to adopt the half-brothers as he did with Tommy.
_	This causes problems between Don and Lucy, as Don becomes friends with the singer, whose marriage collapses upon the revelation that her ex-husband is sleeping with his first wife and only married the singer in order to divorce her and take half her fortune.
_	Herc did say that the biggest shock was the revelation that the Romulans were behind the bombing of the Human Embassy.
_	The tide began to turn against Singel after the revelation that he had voted to parole an individual named Reginald McFadden, who would later be charged for a series of murders in New York City.
_	After sitting there for what seemed like hours (which apparently was only minutes), I had the revelation that this was not the path.
_	This came after the revelation that historic grotesques were destroyed on the Elizabeth Street portion of the building.
_	This event creates a political schism between the USA and Russia, leading to the revelation that the Soviet Union in fact never truly dissolved, complete with the Berlin Wall rising from the ground, Soviet troops and tanks appearing in the streets and Vladimir Lenin rising from his tomb in Moscow.
_	In October 2012, following the revelation that her boyfriend of 8 months, Zac Smith (Mike Edward) had been cheating on her, Sarah found herself attracted once again to TK, who offered her support.
_	The producers of the movie were sued soon after the release of the film, following the revelation that the plot was lifted from 2007 film Namastey London.
_	Thus, the revelation that Aunt May is actually Peter Parker's mother was highly controversial among Spider-Man fans.
_	There was a hint of this last week when we saw Katherine in a flashback with the moonstone, but the revelation that she is pulling the strings on Mason is a surprise, and a good one.
_	He summarizes his feelings in the revelation that across the hockey world, what matters is whether or not you can play.
_	Already on edge due to the revelation that Ben was a murderer, Marah couldn’t deal with Tony’s violent past, believing that he’d fall back into it, and she left him and moved back home.
_	The discussion grows heated and scientific by turns and introduces a new territory to the book with the revelation that Macclesfield recruited a cadre of "Asiatick Pygmies" to colonize the missing time and preserve temporal flow.
_	The film also serves as a canonical sequel to the novel series, which concludes with the revelation that Roland's quest is a cyclical time loop; the presence of the Horn of Eld, which Roland carries in the film, indicates that this is the next cycle.
_	The film ends with the revelation that Jesse used the skull to travel back into the Old West, where he, Charlie and the rest of their friends drive off in a wagon, leaving the crystal skull behind, marking Gramps' new grave.
_	Warpath returns home and tells X-Force what the spirits showed him, which ends with the revelation that Eli is using the Technarch Transmode Virus to revive dead mutants as an offering to his queen, Selene.
_	SOE's position nevertheless remained precarious, and in January 1944 there was a further attempt to dismantle SOE, following the revelation that SOE's operations in the Netherlands had been penetrated by Nazi intelligence.
_	Horrified by the revelation that Donny accidentally caused his death in a friendly fire incident, Julia abandons the Band, only to be admonished by her mother that sometimes (“Everything Happens”) without reason or fault.
_	The film ends with the revelation that leader of The Specials is actually Michele's real mother.
_	The book begins by describing the four main characters – Munira, Karega, Wanja, and Abdulla – just after the revelation that three prominent Kenyans, two businessmen and one educator, have been killed in a fire.
_	This forces the revelation that Charles received most of his money through drug deals and buying off judges.
_	Superman, realizing the error of his ways, is horrified by the revelation that he has essentially become another Brainiac- "an alien bullying a less-developed species."
_	John Prescott remained as Deputy Prime Minister and First Secretary of State, but was stripped of all the departmental ministerial responsibilities formerly associated with the office, apparently at his own request, following the revelation that he had an affair with his secretary.
_	Gemma is later stunned by the revelation that Pietro's real mother, Aska, is still alive and married to Gojko.
_	Following the revelation that Prime Minister Golding had sanctioned the initiative for the Jamaica Labour Party to hire US lobbying firm Manatt, Phelps & Phillips and his handling of the extradition request for Christopher "Dudus" Coke, members and groups of civil society, church groups and political parties called for his resignation.
_	As Warren succumbs to the darkness within him, Dark Beast confronted the team with the revelation that the only place left to turn for a cure is the Age of Apocalypse reality.
_	The arrests followed the revelation that the NSA tapped the chancellor's cellphone.
_	The greatest of these discoveries was the revelation that Embra was not alone, but that another world much like it, but with an extremely weak flow of magic, Earth, was in existence.
_	However, he considered the revelation that Andrews was a turncoat within the Group to be confusing, finding it unclear how a human villain could be defined within a series already making use of demons and theological evil.
_	Any doubts among the family that Bumerli would not make a good husband for Nadina are dispelled by the revelation that he is the son of a wealthy Swiss businessman, and all ends happily.
_	Desperate for attention, Ann befriends Red Cloud and soon the two develop a spiritual bond of friendship, which leads Jake to the revelation that something in his life is missing.
_	The article included the revelation that Kael used the research and interviews of Dr. Howard Suber, an assistant professor at UCLA where she was then a guest lecturer, without ever crediting him.
_	However, following the revelation that Milwaukee School Board secretary A.H. Schattenberg had embezzled over $50,000, and his subsequent suicide, a citywide audit was conducted.
_	Enron's demise occurred after the revelation that much of its profits and revenue were the result of deals with special purpose entities (limited partnerships which it controlled).
_	Many fans and critics reacted extremely negatively to the revelation that Principal Skinner, a recurring character since the first season who had undergone a lot of character development, was an impostor.
_	The story begins with the revelation that Wulfgar, half brother to both Tristan and Shailiha, lives but it horribly scarred.
_	These verses attest to the revelation that Lima has not found her roots after all; a dilemma that plagues not only the poet and her Santomean compatriots, but all those whose ancestors were enslaved.
_	Neil Gaiman has said that Pratchett had originally planned to end the book with the revelation that Granny Weatherwax had temporarily placed her consciousness within You the cat, and that Death would only collect her in the epilogue, after she says "I am leaving on my own terms now;" however, Pratchett's health deteriorated too quickly for him to be able to write this scene.
_	Innovations include a long conversation between the thanes of Glamiss and Candor, the characters a lemonade seller and butterfly hunter, and the revelation that the rightful heir to the throne is a worse tyrant than Macbett ever was.
_	Even the revelation that Sally has sold her baby for drug money fails to snap him out of it.
_	Meanwhile, NBC page Kenneth Parcell (Jack McBrayer) is stung by the revelation that most events from the 2008 Summer Olympics were staged to boost America's image and NBC's ratings.
_	In 2011, the character would be written into more traditional soap opera plots starting with the revelation that he is the long lost grandson of the wealthy Katherine Chancellor (Jeanne Cooper).
_	Together, the books and the open drapery signify the revelation that Old Testament prophecy has been fulfilled in the birth of the Christ Child to the Virgin.
_	While this story resulted in the elevation of Goodluck Jonathan to the presidency, other stories such as the revelation that the Oil Minister Rilwanu Lukman was still in the oil business and involved in massive bribery were utterly ignored by officials.
_	So sensational was the revelation that at least one of the five journalists broke ranks; and the news that the Lockerbie villains would soon be behind bars in Scotland was divulged to the public.
_	In March 2015 Quintin Kynaston received unwelcome publicity with the revelation that Mohammed Emwazi, the ISIL killer who was portrayed in the media as "Jihadi John", had been a student at the school, leaving it in 2006.
_	Despite being voted in by the public, the revelation that he was gay was seen as part of the reason he was evicted from the game, as he had potentially lost votes from the female viewers who had voted him in based on his physical appearance.
_	The first family issue was Vanessa kidnapping and nearly killing Greenlee, and the revelation that Vanessa had long been Proteus, head of an international drug cartel.
_	The episode receive attention upon the revelation that Oswald Cobblepot's character turned out to be gay.
_	This negative publicity was compounded by the revelation that GM declined to include suspension upgrades that would have given the Corvair safer handling for cost reasons.
_	Issue No. 21, the first in the "Dark Reign" event, centers on the aftermath of the failed Skrull invasion, and the revelation that the shape-shifting aliens had infiltrated and corrupted the Fifty-State Initiative and Camp Hammond, where the registered heroes were trained.
_	In 1980, they released a first episode about Project MKUltra, which not only held the testimony of two Canadian patients who’d undergone the treatment speaking out for the first time, but also the revelation that Ottowa had aided to suppress information that CIA officials had apologised to the Canadian government following the initial revelation of the experimentation.
_	Since her first appearance in 1999 she has been involved in several high-profile storylines, including her marriage to Jack Sugden (Clive Hornby) and his subsequent death, a battle with colon cancer, the revelation that her ex-husband Rodney Blackstock (Patrick Mower) fathered her sister Val Lambert's (Charlie Hardwick) son, being held hostage in a siege at The Woolpack, sleeping with her sister Val's husband Eric Pollard (Chris Chittell), assaulting a police officer, being involved in a helicopter crash, coping with her sister Val's death in the crash, being stabbed by Chas Dingle (Lucy Pargeter) after thinking she broke into the pub, the revelation that her cancer is active and a feud with Chrissie White (Louise Marwood) after it is revealed that she framed Andy Sugden (Kelvin Fletcher) - Diane's adoptive stepson - for attempted murder.
_	He eventually moved to New York City where he continued to battle depression, self-doubt and failure until the revelation that turned him into a success.
_	She approaches the Scarlet Witch with the revelation that she was her daughter.
_	The act has been described by investigators as an Islamic terrorist attack and a hate crime, despite the revelation that he was suffering from mental health issues and acted alone.
_	Serena is looking through old Gossip Girl blasts and comes upon the revelation that, besides Nate, Dan was the last good man she's dated.
_	Season 5 opens with Nate having moved the team to Portland and setting up shop in a microbrewery (Bridgeport Brew Pub), but the season premiere ends with the revelation that Nate is working with Hardison on a secret project unknown to the others.
_	Some conversation with Erika, however, lead to the revelation that both women had been told they were part of Chill Town.
_	Hilary and Mariah clash over how to handle the revelation that her mother Sharon Newman (Sharon Case) has secretly been raising her ex-husband Nick's (Joshua Morrow) presumed dead son.
_	Following the revelation that Kim's death was the result of the VX nerve agent, a nerve agent classified as a weapon of mass destruction by the United Nations Security Council Resolution 687 and outlawed by the Chemical Weapons Convention of 1993, Malaysia threatened the expulsion of the North Korean ambassador to Malaysia, referring to his claims of collusion as "delusional".
_	It was reported that some players had become uneasy with Patston’s role in the team, and with how much power McKenzie had given her following the revelation that Patston had input into the player disciplinary measures that occurred on the 2013 Spring Tour.
_	Eventually Bruce is forced into taking leave due to injuries he suffers while dressed as his ex-wife, leading to the revelation that he committed the racially motivated murder that serves as the novel's main plot and that the colleagues he despises – particularly his boss Robert Toal – have been aware of his guilt all along and have been protecting him from the consequences of his actions out of a mixture of loyalty and pity.
_	In the end, the problem is resolved by the revelation that Francisco is Valentine's long-lost son — which explains the older man's irrational bond with the younger.
_	After renewing their friendship, Terry is shocked by the revelation that Ramani has accepted a job with the Child Abuse Investigation Team, subsequently ending any chance he may have for a relationship with her.
_	In regards to the revelation that Patty was gay, "The A.V. Club" wrote that it "wasn't particularly earth-shattering" but that Marge's initial reaction provided a good twist to the episode.
_	The confrontation leads to the Beast hacking into Banner's work servers and the revelation that he had been injecting himself with dead gamma-irradiated cells.
_	For example, the revelation that Devon Bradley, the FBI agent in the episode who is revealed to be a con artist, was inspired by such films.
_	His healing powers from "The Twelve" also manifest themselves again, in the form of the revelation that Angel's blood has miracle healing properties.
_	The move came after a public outcry following the revelation that a farmer, convicted for murder based on his confession under torture, was in fact innocent.
_	Ivanova is clearly hurt by the revelation that Talia is actually a "sleeper" Psi Corps agent who had been sent to spy on the command staff of Babylon 5.
_	Anderson is initially disappointed with the explanation, and as Sherlock leaves, he tries to prove that it is fake, before having the revelation that he is the last person Sherlock would come to to reveal the truth about his death.
_	Most recently the agency has been stung by the revelation that Michelle Williams was paid $1,000 for her work reshooting scences for “All The Money” while co-star Mark Wahlberg was paid $1,500,000.
_	After leaving the man holding the photos, Bill realises it is Roderick Pyke, which in turn leads to the revelation that he loves Flick.
_	However, on the revelation that the NSA has been secretly spying on Google's data centers worldwide, he called the practice "outrageous" and criticized the NSA's collection of Americans phone records.
_	The couple separated in 2000 after the revelation that Snowdon, then aged 67, had fathered a son, Jasper William Oliver Cable-Alexander (born 30 April 1998), with Melanie Cable-Alexander, an editor at "Country Life" magazine.
_	Despite the revelation that Hal's past villainous activity was because of the influence of the parasite Parallax, many of his fellow Corps officers are unwilling to trust him.
_	Bree does not believe Leila but later comes to the revelation that maybe she is right.
_	The season ends on a cliffhanger, with the revelation that Finn's father is still alive.
_	Stern was unhappy with the revelation that his character's civilian identity was Ned Leeds, and in 1997 he wrote a three-issue miniseries, "Spider-Man: Hobgoblin Lives", with the retcon that Roderick Kingsley was the original Hobgoblin, and had brainwashed Leeds into serving as a fall guy.
_	The title was coined during a studio banter between both artists about the state of the music industry, with 9th coming to the revelation that in today's climate an artist can no longer attain the same iconic heights as those of an earlier era .
_	In February 2014, amidst the controversy created by the revelation that a Duke University student was also an actress in adult films and was using her earnings to pay for her tuition, Reign reached out via her blog in "The Huffington Post" to offer her support to the harassed student.
_	Also included is an alternate ending where Gavin meets a different fate than the one used in the theatrical release, and the revelation that Caldicott's program is assisted by a shadowy organization seeking a "prototype".
_	The chief executive Mike Gordon stepped down in June 2014 after the revelation that seven per cent of the firm’s 150,000 patients had not received their medication on time or in full during the last six months.
_	Angelise, who is bewildered by the revelation that she herself was a Norma all along, turns into a target of hate of the people in the blink of an eye.
_	Poppet and Widget negotiate the release of the remaining circus properties from the former producer and Mr. A.H-, and the book ends with the revelation that Poppet, Widget, Bailey and the circus still exist in the modern day, preserved for a century and more.
_	The film looks at the relationship between Polley's parents, Michael and Diane Polley, including the revelation that the filmmaker was the product of an extramarital affair between her mother and Montreal producer Harry Gulkin.
_	Jack is sent into a tailspin by the revelation that his mother actually wanted him to be happy, which leads to him re-evaluating his life and career in the finale.
_	The film begins with the revelation that the main character will commit a murder one week from the next scene, although it is not revealed who will be killed or why.
_	The series concludes with the revelation that Fitz has been kidnapped and placed into a simulation by the Shadowy Figure.
_	Infringements of the Code are taken very seriously, especially regarding digital alteration of published photographs, as evidenced by a case in which Pulitzer prize-nominated photographer Allan Detrich resigned his post following the revelation that a number of his photographs had been manipulated.
_	Story-edited at Marvel Productions by Bryce Malek and Dick Robbins, the season begins with the revelation that the Decepticons have survived the events of the pilot and follows them as they set about constructing a "space bridge" to teleport resources back to Cybertron.
_	Combined with Ben's death in a battle with the reborn Norman Osborn and the revelation that the tests identifying Peter as the clone were actually rigged as part of Osborn's plan to break Peter's spirit, Peter returns to the role of Spider-Man.
_	However, she does stun Mike with the revelation that she hasn't seen classic movies like "Casablanca" or "Citizen Kane", dismissing them as "old".
_	Following the revelation that he had sanctioned the initiative for the Jamaica Labour Party to hire US lobbying firm Manatt, Phelps & Phillips and his handling of the extradition request for Christopher "Dudus" Coke, members and groups of civil society, church groups and political parties called for his resignation.
_	It is a new day and a new arrangement, and the Lord has now given the revelation that sheds light out into the world on this subject.
_	Although Esther's husband, Walther, is able to hack into the Reich's computer network and change the Klein's family history, it is the revelation that Reichsführer-SS Lothar Prützmann has a nephew with Tay-Sachs that brings the investigation to a halt.
_	Leisha is left with the revelation that trade is not linear, but rather an ecology, and that today's beggar may be tomorrow's savior.
_	The clash between these two powers marked the end of the first season, and served to provide Primal with the revelation that drove the second - that he had been wrong, and that the Oracle desired not the domination of one power over the other, but a balance between the organic and the technological.
_	However, the revelation that a considerably larger segment of the membership than had been believed were the radical Fifth Monarchists led to its members voting to dissolve it on 12 December 1653, out of fear of what the radicals might do if they took control of the Assembly.
_	Meanwhile, Adam, who had returned to town under the false identity of Gabriel Bingham, had teamed up with Ian (who had escaped prison) to create a computer virus to destroy Newman Enterprises for separate revenge on both their parts; the virus was known as the Paragon project, which later led to the revelation that "Gabriel" is in fact Adam.
_	Darcy had been misled to believe she was mixed race due to a recessive gene through a Jamaican ancestor and is disturbed by the revelation that her real father is D.C. Washington.
_	In 1980, his article revealing the existence of the secret Standing Committee on Pressure Groups (SCOPG) in Hong Kong led to the revelation that most pressure groups and individual members of the Opposition were under surveillance by the colonial government.
_	In 1907, Georgia head football coach Bull Whitney was caught in a controversy over the revelation that there were at least four paid professionals on the Georgia and Georgia Tech teams during the game played that year.
_	Even more shocking was the revelation that Viki/Niki had given birth to a daughter.
_	What follows is the revelation that Gerald is the illegitimate child of Mrs. Arbuthnot and Lord Illingworth, once known as George Harford.
_	However, Baley then confronts Amadiro with the revelation that Amadiro knew of the relationship between Gladia and Jander, and moreover, of her considering him her husband; something quite unthinkable for a native Auroran.
_	Despite the revelation that the bodies of Crenshaw and Vanessa are not on board, Mitchell and Frank attempt to jettison the spaceship's second stage, resulting in an explosion, that causes their spacecraft to go out of control.
_	And in the midst of all this, she is devastated by the revelation that she is adopted, and is actually the child of brother-in-law Rameez's father's deceased cousin.
_	In the wake of the revelation that passports of British citizens had figured prominently in the operation, the United Kingdom's Serious Organised Crime Agency (SOCA) launched its own investigation into the matter, and plans to interview the first round of British passport holders that had their identities stolen.
_	Returning to New York City, where the demonic invasion is already in full swing, she confronts X-Factor with the revelation that she is alive.
_	She was originally set to testify against Cross at Neil's trial but stunned Ted and the entire court with the revelation that she could no longer testify as she and Cross had just eloped.
_	On the episode which aired on September 24, 2015, the episode culminates with the revelation that Wilson's Ben is the mysterious Necktie Killer when he is shown going over the evidence.
_	On the eve of "Flavor Of Life"'s release as a physical single came the revelation that "Flavor Of Life -ballad version-" had sold over 2,000,000 ring tones before its release date, a first for any song or single in Japan and worldwide.
_	"Smallville"s first season primarily dealt with Clark Kent's coming to terms with his alien origin and the revelation that his arrival on Earth was connected to the death of Lana Lang's parents.
_	In his definition of "disarmament", David Carlton writes in the Oxford University Press Political dictionary, "But confidence in such measures of arms control, especially when unaccompanied by extensive means of verification, has not been strengthened by the revelation that the Soviet Union in its last years successfully concealed consistent and systematic cheating on its obligations under the Biological Weapons Convention."
_	Inner Baltar and Inner Six appear to Baltar and Caprica Six – all four sharing a moment together – as the first part of the revelation that the "Inners" are divine beings (referred to as "Angels") manipulating both the Colonials and Cylons into fulfilling "God's plan" (series finale).
_	This was Mr. Zuckerberg’s first appearance before Congress, prompted by the revelation that Cambridge Analytica, a political consulting firm linked to the Trump campaign, harvested the data of an estimated 87 million Facebook users to psychologically profile voters during the 2016 election.
_	The contract signing for Aniversario concluded in the revelation that José Laureano would be the special referee.
_	Notable cut scenes include Michael comparing Toby to the flu, Toby giving his going-away speech and then being interrupted by Michael, Holly asking Pam if Kevin just ate before jumping in the bounce castle, Jim not sure whether Ryan is going to downsize him, Jim and Pam browsing for apartments online, the revelation that Kevin's band Scrantonicity played 30 full Police songs, all out of tune and off-beat, during Phyllis's wedding, Kelly watching Ryan's YouTube arrest video over and over again at Jim's desk, Jim asking about the website, and Troy (Noel Potek)—Ryan's drug dealer—showing up in Scranton.
_	He describes the novel as unique in the sense that a key element of the story—the revelation that Bud Corliss (whose character remains unnamed through the first third portion of the novel) was Dorothy's murderer—takes the reader by complete surprise.
_	A libel case brought by Mona Bauwens against "The People", which came to the High Court in September 1992, led to the revelation that Mellor had accepted the gift of a month-long holiday in Marbella from Bauwens for his family which took place in August 1990.
_	Writers soon devised a break up story for Elly and Ned, beginning with the revelation that Regan's husband was recurring villain Jacka Hills (Brad McMurray).
_	Characteristic of O. Henry's surprise endings to stories, the story ends with the revelation that the policeman who met Bob earlier was Jimmy Wells, but lacking heart to arrest his own friend who he recognizes to be a noted criminal, he sent another policeman in plain clothes to arrest him.
_	VIII of England may have had Kell-positive blood type, explaining the deaths of seven of his ten children at, or soon after, birth, and suggesting that his mental deterioration around age 40 could be explained by McLeod Syndrome; this was supported by the revelation that Henry may have inherited Kell from his maternal great-grandmother, Jacquetta of Luxembourg.
_	The Liberal campaign was also damaged by the revelation that the shadow treasurer, Robert Dean, was ineligible to run.
_	This episode ends with the revelation that Pops is watching his friends from Heaven on a VHS labeled "Regular Show".
_	Walton said she felt Jill had been "shaken to the very foundation" upon the revelation that Katherine is her mother, stating: "A big part of who she has been all these years has to do with her anger towards Katherine.
_	When Barry Allen enters the Batcave, Batman attacks Allen, but is surprised to hear Barry call him Bruce, with the revelation that Bruce died years ago allowing Barry to deduce that he is facing Thomas Wayne rather than his son.
_	Following the revelation that the crucial evidence against him had been faked, Thomas was pardoned and awarded NZ$950,000 in compensation for his 9 years in prison and loss of earnings.
_	Atwell later departed and the storyline was phased out until the revelation that the storyline had actually proved so popular with viewers that producers brought back Atwell's character to resume their relationship.
_	The spin-off series included the love blossoming between Alik and Louise, the competition between Spencer and Stevie for Billie before Stevie’s ex-girlfriend Stephanie arrives, Alex attempting to make amends with people then leaving with more enemies than friends, and the revelation that Lucy and Proudlock have been hooking up.
_	The 2009-2010 banking crisis occurred in Venezuela when a number of the banks of Venezuela were taken over by the government, after "the revelation that several banks owned by [Hugo Chavez] supporters were in financial trouble after engaging in questionable business practices.
_	Alec's personal feelings towards fighting grow more tense over time, only mollified by the revelation that Chief Ruby, leader of the school's science lab, has found a way to help enable him to fight within the labyrinths using crystals discovered in previous Dusk Circles.
_	Before the release of "The Phantom Menace" and the revelation that C-3PO was constructed by a young Anakin Skywalker, the canon account of C-3PO's creation placed his construction on the planet Affa 112 years before "A New Hope".
_	"CBS Soaps In Depth" said Sherwood "got off to a slow start", but praised her work during the revelation that Lily's husband Daniel was responsible for her attempted rape by Alex.
_	The story ends with the revelation that what the reader understands to be Benjamin's contemporaneous rendering of the events is in fact a suicide note that his father, the old rabbi, has read each day for the last ten years since the suicide occurred.
_	High Commissioner for Human Rights, Navi Pillay, subsequently voiced concern at the revelation that private companies were being pressured by states to sever their relationships with WikiLeaks.
_	It was the first of Tiptree's books published after the revelation that Tiptree was a female, rather than male, writer.
_	He is the author of the memoir "Breaking The Chain" detailing his escape from drug addiction and the revelation that he attempted to kill his abusive father at the age of twelve.
_	The novel ignores the revelation that Hell Close was all a dream, and depicts the royal family as still living there, with Jack Barker is still in power.
_	After the revelation that Jack was their half-brother through their shared mother, Prose Page, they were horrified to realize that they'd committed incest.
_	The family outcast until the death of Kay's father and the revelation that the old Colonel had invested badly, he saved the day by kindly taking her in.
_	It was changed at Nimoy's suggestion to the revelation that Spock had already come to terms with the human side of his nature, and Sybok had admiration for that.
_	Time is short, and no man could fully prepare themselves with the revelation that this secret holds, a secret Talus’ two brothers will discover: that they are already dead.
_	In October 2010, After an interview at The Source Magazine Head Quarters where Freekey Zekey insinuated that a Dipset deal with Interscope Records was possible by pointing to a magazine cover with Dr. Dre’s picture (in addition to the revelation that the group has actually recorded with Dre), Freekey confirmed that the group would be signing a deal with the label:
_	In October 2012, following the revelation that her boyfriend of 8 months, Zac Smith (Mike Edward) had been cheating on her, Sarah found herself attracted once again to TK, who offered her support.
_	In recent years, DC changed her background with the revelation that she is the daughter of Zeus and Hippolyta, jointly raised by her mother and her aunts Antiope and Menalippe.
_	Quire has become depressed because of an unrequited crush on Sophie of the Stepford Cuckoos; his unpopular status among the Institute students; and especially the revelation that he was an adopted child, which shatters his already fragile self-esteem.
_	Irked, Serena is further thrown off by the revelation that he is her Psychology of Business professor, a fact that threats their relationship.
_	Fallon is devastated at the revelation that Blake is not her father, but a blood test proves their biological connection in "The Gun" as Steven follows Sammy Jo to Hollywood.
_	Ethan does not last long as the heir, however, and is quickly disowned later that year for breaking off his engagement to Gwen Hotchkiss in order to marry Theresa; the revelation that Ethan is Sam Bennett's son removes Ethan from Alistair's will completely.
_	The unpopularity of her replacing Julie Andrews – who had originated the role on Broadway and, coincidentally, the Best Actress winner of the year for "Mary Poppins" – as well as the revelation that the majority of her singing was dubbed by Marni Nixon (which wasn't approved by Hepburn herself) were seen as the main reasons for the snub.
_	Upon the death of his stepfather, Adam Albert von Neipperg, and the revelation that his mother had borne two illegitimate children to him prior to their marriage, Franz grew distant from his mother and felt that his Austrian family were holding him back to avoid political controversy.
_	This view was supported by several Japanese officers, both before and after the revelation that Nakagawa was responsible.
_	He eventually beats Jessica Biel following the revelation that she hates avocados.
_	His responsibilities included driving acting boss Silvio Dante while Tony was in the ICU, guarding Tony's ICU room and chasing down Vito Spatafore to his comare's beach house following the revelation that he was homosexual.
_	The meetings provide a source of support and friendship for Precious as well as the revelation that her color and socioeconomic background weren't necessarily the cause of her abuse.
_	Green of Digital Spy said that he was taken aback by the "standout performances" during the revelation that Colin was Julie's father.
_	This episode focuses on Moira Queen's acquittal for her alleged crimes at the end of season 1, ending with the revelation that Malcolm Merlyn is Thea Queen's father, not Robert Queen as previously thought.
_	When the press uncovered the fact that Charles had listed his current marital status as "single" on his marriage licence, the revelation that the marriage between Alla and Charles had been a sham from the beginning embroiled Nazimova in a scandal that damaged her career.
_	Then comes the revelation that the singer was in fact her aunt, who was disowned by her family for rebelliously learning music from a concubine.
_	They soon returned to Xavier's School after their recovery and the revelation that the White Queen had employed Empath to coerce Magneto into allowing the transfer.
_	Hope, who was not running for re-election in 2014, resigned on July 24 after the revelation that he has been registered to vote in both Washington and Ohio since 2013.
_	After his death, the revelation that he and Paul LeDuc were not related caused a minor scandal on talk shows in Quebec.
_	Despite this, they felt that the plot "offer[ed] nothing unexpected" and that its position, after the revelation that Scully has cancer in "Leonard Betts" caused it to look "as if it's cheating on the consequences of Scully's illness".
_	An investigation by "The Oregonian" in 2013 led to the revelation that some TriMet drivers were working as many as 22 hours in a 24-hour period.
_	Jack is still at odds with Todd upon his reappearance in April 2013, soon rejoicing at the revelation that adoptive father Victor, Jr. is alive.
_	Further complicating the situation was the revelation that Matrix' sacrifice in attempting to save Linda transformed her and Linda into the Earth-born Angel of Fire.
_	However unlike Daksha, Sati loved Shiva as she had the revelation that Shiva was the Supreme God.
_	She concluded, "So different is the premiere that the savvy "House" (and Fox) viewer may expect the revelation that it was all a fever dream.
_	November 1937 brought the revelation that Rogers had been attempting to secure additional financing for the studio.
_	TV.com's Kaitlin Thomas praised the episode for the revelation that the Mother set Barney off on the road that will lead him to marrying Robin.
_	Matthew Fox received much praise for his performance in the scene in which his character Jack reacts to the revelation that Claire is his half-sister.
_	After the revelation that Daniels and Kazarian had fabricated the whole Claire Lynch pregnancy story to blackmail Styles, Styles vowed revenge, and is using his rematch clause to challenge for the titles that Daniels and Kazarian won from Styles and Angle in June.
_	Tim Goodman from the "San Francisco Chronicle" thought the revelation that Tom is gay was a "unique and funny twist".
_	When Joey's relationship with Jack crumbles due to the revelation that he is homosexual, she comes literally crying to Dawson.
_	As the short concludes it becomes apparent that the woman is not there of her own volition—her expression having become horrified in the most recent examination—and the film ends with the revelation that there is a final person in the image, a cloaked and menacing figure reflected in the sunglasses worn by one of the men.
_	The episode ends with the revelation that the coastline around the factory perfectly matches the map drawn by Teddy, and that unbeknownst to the kids, Taff was full of gold bars.
_	However, after the revelation that RAI would lose €80m ($96m, £54m) in 2006, the privatization plan was suspended in October 2005.
_	In the end of the series, Lee is the real-estate agent that is offering Susan's house, following the revelation that she is leaving Wisteria Lane.
_	The spin-off series included the love blossoming between Alik and Louise, the competition between Spencer and Stevie for Billie before Stevie’s ex-girlfriend Stephanie arrives, Alex attempting to make amends with people then leaving with more enemies than friends, and the revelation that Lucy and Proudlock have been hooking up.
_	The films ends with the revelation that everything from the disfigurement onward seems to have been a dream experienced by Rowan at the party.
_	Hillary Clinton, however, continued to be embroiled in controversies of her own, the biggest being the revelation that she had used an unsecured private email server during her tenure as Secretary of State, leaving the possibility of having mismanaged or compromised classified documents.
_	He seems no more or less emotionally moved by this than by the revelation that he cannot understand imaginary numbers.
_	In 1982, the Bonanno family was rocked by the revelation that one of their associates, Donnie Brasco, was actually a Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) undercover agent named Joseph Pistone.
_	Hartman Rector Jr. taught some basic criteria during a speech at BYU entitled "How to Know if Revelation Is from the Lord" that can help members of the church know whether the revelation that someone receives is actually coming from God.
_	"Raised by Another" marks the revelation that Ethan (William Mapother) is not among the remaining survivors of Oceanic Flight 815 and is instead an outsider, revealed to be one of the Others alluded to in the previous episode.
_	Fans were somewhat disappointed with the ending, in particular the revelation that Kevin and Winnie don't end up as a couple.
_	The rock-and-roll movement of the 1950s quickly came to an end in 1959 as explained in the song "Day The Music Died", the revelation that Jerry Lee Lewis had married his 13 year old cousin, and the induction of Elvis Presley into the US Army.
_	At the time this wasn't mentioned, but the revelation that Healy was depressed ties in with the band's decision to take longer writing and releasing their next work.
_	Following the revelation that two of the alleged murder victims Herak claimed to have seen Damjanović kill were still alive and that subsequent to the convictions the District Military Court had issued an investigation warrant identifying the three killers of a third, Ramiz Kršo, as Nenad Damjanović, Bozo Jeftić and Miro Vuković, concern was expressed that the Bosnian judicial system might be discredited as a result and charges against more senior figures might be jeopardised.
_	The news of the possibility of a three-part 15-minute song also came with the revelation that the band had begun recording and were loosely aiming for a late-2009 release.
_	"No drama was found in the revelation that the new UW-Eau Claire student center will retain the W. R. Davies moniker," reported the "Leader-Telegram", "just satisfaction that a key early leader of the university will continue to be honored for many decades to come."
_	Widely regarded as the front-runner in 1923, McAdoo's candidacy was badly hurt by the revelation that he had previously accepted a $25,000 contribution from Edward L. Doheny, an oil tycoon implicated in 1922 in the Teapot Dome scandal.
_	After Luke purges all doubt from his mind by watching the last of R2-D2's family recordings that revealed Darth Vader and Padme's last time together on the planet Mustafar, where he witnesses the revelation that Darth Vader had force-chocked her, leaving Luke shocked that his father would do this.
_	Shawn left Salem distraught and confused by the revelation that Belle's mother, Marlena Evans, was the Salem Stalker and responsible for the death of Shawn's family members.
_	The video ends with the revelation that Perry stabbed her lover in the white room in the back, as she sings tearfully while covered in blood before the shot spans to the side, showing the knife on the floor.
